<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR881110-0018 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.11-10-88.f2.A1017</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 53, No. 218 / Thrusday, November 10, 1987/ Rules and Regulations<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF LABOR</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Employment Standards Administration, Wage and Hour Division</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">29 CFR Parts 516 and 530</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Employment of Homeworkers in Certain Industries; Records To Be Keptby Employers</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Wage and Hour Division, ESA, Labor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rules.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>This document provides a final rule on restrictions affectingthe employment of industrial homeworkers in certain industries under section11(d) of the Fair Labor Standards Act (FLSA). It also provides a finalrule amending the recordkeeping requirements imposed pursuant to section11(c) of the FLSA for all covered employers of homeworkers. There are presentlysix industries in which homework is banned under section 11(d) of the FLSAunless special individual certificates are obtained. The six industriesare: Women's apparel, jewelry manufacturing, gloves and mittens, buttonand buckle manufacturing, handkerchief manufacturing, and embroideries.(Under a rule adopted in 1984, homework is permitted in the knitted outerwearindustry, provided the employer first obtains a certificate from the Departmentof Labor.) For the reasons discussed below, the Department has decidedthat the current restrictions should be modified.Under the final rule, the women's apparel industry and activities in thejewelry industry not identified herein as nonhazardous remain subject tothe same restrictions on homework as in the prior rule. Any employer whowishes to employ homeworkers in the remaining restricted industries mustfirst obtain a certificate from the Department authorizing such employment.Employers in the knitted outerwear industry must obtain new certificatesin accordance with this rule. Any such employer who does not first obtaina certificate cannot legally employ homeworkers (other than those homeworkersfor whom special certificates have been issued under certain specifiedconditions) and is subject to the restrictions and sanctions provided bythe FLSA. Also, a number of clarifying changes have been made in the textof the final rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>January 9, 1989. The paperwork requirements ofthis regulation andSection;andSection; 530.102, 530.103, 530.202, and 516.31(c))are effective January 9, 1989, provided they have been approved by theOffice of Management and Budget in accordance with the Paperwork ReductionAct of 1980, as amended. If they are not approved by January 9, 1989, anotice will be published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> delaying the effective date.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Paula V. Smith, Administrator,Wage and Hour Division, U.S. Department of Labor, Room S-3502, 200 ConstitutionAvenue, NW., Washington, DC 20210, (202) 523-8305. This is not a toll-freenumber.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Paperwork Reduction Act</ITAG>In accordance with the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980, the recordkeepingprovisions that are included in these rules, including revisions to thehomeworker handbooks, have been submitted to the Office of Management andBudget for approval. The Wage and Hour Division has requested an expeditedreview of its submission under the Act, to be completed within 30 daysof the date of publication in the <T4>Federal Register.</T4> A copy of the submission is being separatelypublished in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> for the convenience of the public.Public reporting burden for this collection of information, including thetime for reviewing instructions, searching data sources, gathering andmaintaining the data needed, and completing and reviewing the collectionof information, is estimated to average, per response: (1) Homework application(andSection; 530.102 and .103)_\1/2\ hour; (2) piecework measurement documentation(andSection; 530.202)_1 hour per measurement plus 1 minute for filing; (3)homeworker handbook (andSection; 516.31(c))_\1/2\ hour completion time bythe homeworker plus \1/2\ minute for filing by the employer. Send commentsregarding this burden estimate or any other aspect of this collection ofinformation, including suggestions for reducing this burden, to the Officeof Management and Budget, Washington, DC 20503.<ITAG tagnum="84">Background  </ITAG>Statutory Provisions and History of Homework Regulations  Section 11(d) of the FLSA provides that the Secretary of Labor is ``authorizedto make such regulations and orders regulating, restricting, or prohibitingindustrial homework as are necessary or appropriate to prevent the circumventionor evasion of and to safeguard the minimum wage rate prescribed in thisAct.'' Pursuant to this authority, the Secretary has issued regulations,published as Part 530 of Title 29 of the Code of Federal Regulations. Asoriginally issued in the 1940's, these regulations restricted the employmentof industrial homework in seven industries: Knitted outerwear; women'sapparel; jewelry manufacturing; gloves and mittens; button and buckle manufacturing;handkerchief manufacturing; and embroideries. Homework in other industrieshas not been restricted. The regulations essentially provide that the productionof goods in these restricted industries may not be carried on by employeesin or about a home, apartment, tenement, or room in a residential establishmentexcept by a certified homeworker. Under specified conditions, an employermay obtain a certificate for employees who are unable to adjust to factorywork because of age or physical or mental disability or who are unableto leave home because their presence is required to care for an invalidthere. Individuals may also be employed as industrial homeworkers in therestricted industries under the supervision of a sheltered workshop withoutobtaining a certificate under Part 530.  Final Rule Establishing a Certification System in Knitted Outerwear IndustryEffective December 5, 1984  In 1980, in light of the fact that the homework regulations had been ineffect for almost 40 years without substantive revision, the Departmentundertook a review of the status of industrial homework. The Departmentpublished a proposal in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> on May 5, 1981 (46 FR 25108) to remove the existingrestrictions on homework in all seven industries. On October 9, 1981, afterreviewing the entire record, the Department issued a final rule rescindingthe restrictions on the employment of homeworkers in the knitted outerwearindustry only (46 FR 50348).  This rulemaking action was challenged in court by the International Ladies'Garment Workers' Union (ILGWU), various knitgoods manufacturers, the NewYork and California State Labor Commissioners, and others who sought toenjoin the rescission. The United States District Court for the Districtof Columbia upheld the rule. However, on November 29, 1983, the Court ofAppeals for the District of Columbia Circuit vacated the rescission ofthe restriction and remanded the case to the district court resulting inthe reinstatement of restrictions in the knitted outerwear industry onMay 23, 1984.  The Court of Appeals ruled that the final rule had been promulgated inviolation of the Administrative Procedure Act, in that the Department hadfailed to articulate adequately the reasons for its action (<T3>ILGWU</T3> v. <T3>Donovan</T3>, 722 F.2d 795 (DC Cir. 1983)). The court was concernedthat the Department had failed to consider alternatives to the completelifting of the ban, and that the record lacked factual support for theDepartment's assertion that an effective enforcement program would be feasibleif the ban were lifted. In this connection, the court focused on four factorswhich arguably rendered the enforcement of the minimum wage for homeworkersdifficult or impossible:  1. Difficulty of locating and identifying homeworkers;  2. Inadequate or nonexistent recordkeeping by employers and employees; 3. Strain on departmental resources required by excessive investigativetime in homework cases; and  4. Difficulty in recovering back wages when violations were discovered. Thereafter, the Department published a proposal on March 27, 1984 (49 FR11786) to repromulgate a permanent rule rescinding the restrictions inknitted outerwear, and solicited comments on various alternatives to totalrescission. A second comment period was announced on June 22, 1984 (49FR 25641) inviting comments on the alternatives to total rescission, and,in particular, comments pertaining to licensing/registration of employersof industrial homeworkers.  On March 27, 1984, the Department also promulgated an ``emergency'' rule(49 FR 11792) temporarily rescinding the restrictions on homework in knittedouterwear for 120 days, to avoid potential disruption to homeworkers whilethe new rulemaking was pending. On May 8, 1984, the District Court ruledthat the emergency rule was invalid, and ordered that it be rescinded forthwith. On November 5, 1984, a final rule was published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> (49 FR 44262) which permits the use of homeworkersin the knitted outerwear industry, provided the employer first obtainsa certificate from the Department. Those knitted outerwear employers whodo not obtain such certificates remain subject to the ban on homework andto the same restrictions applicable in the case of the other six restrictedindustries. The authority of the Department to promulgate this regulationwas never challenged.   On August 21, 1986, the Department of Labor published a proposed rule which,if adopted, would have lifted the restrictions on the employment of homeworkersin all restricted industries for employers who first obtain certificatesauthorizing homework from the Department. Thus, the proposal would haveexpanded the certification program currently in effect in the knitted outerwearindustry. The period for public comment on the proposed rule, after havingbeen extended, expired on December 4, 1986.  A number of the commenters indicated their belief that the Department wouldface substantial difficulty in enforcing the FLSA under the proposal. Specifically,these commenters argued that the enforcement had been ineffective amongemployers of homeworkers in the knitted outerwear industry under the rulepromulgated in 1984. The Department reviewed its enforcement experiencein knitted outerwear in light of the issues raised in these comments and,recognizing the validity of some of the concerns raised, issued a revisedproposal on March 30, 1988, which incorporated a number of provisions designedto improve and strengthen FLSA enforcements with respect to homeworkers.That notice also stated that any action with respect to the restrictionson homework in the women's apparel industry would be the subject of separaterulemaking proceedings. In addition, those manufacturing operations inthe jewelry industry that were believed to be potentially hazardous werenot included in the March 30, 1988, proposal. Thus, those portions of theAugust 21, 1986, proposal relating to the women's apparel and jewelry industries(other than those operations identified in the revised proposal as nonhazardous)were specifically withdrawn.  Increased Homeworker Enforcement Efforts  Since 1981, the Department has conducted a concerted compliance effortto detect violations of the FLSA among homeworkers. As part of this effort,the Department has given priority to investigating all complaints receivedinvolving homework, has followed up on all leads regarding employment ofhomeworkers, and has actively sought to ensure that homework activity,wherever it occurs, is in compliance with the FSLA. Between October 1981and September 1987, 1,926 investigations of employers utilizing homeworkerswere completed as compared with approximately 75 to 80 such investigationsduring the entire previous six-year period. Of the 1,926 investigationscompleted, 170 involved knitted outerwear employers; 573 were of otherrestricted industry employers; and the remaining 1,183 involved employersin nonrestricted industries.  The Department is fully committed to maintaining a strong and effectiveFLSA enforcement program in industries utilizing homeworkers and will continueto provide a sufficient level of resources to insure the accomplishmentof this goal. In this regard, the FY 1989 Budget request submitted to theCongress included 20 additional full-time equivalent (FTE) positions forenforcement of the FLSA among employers of homeworkers. The Departmentwill monitor its enforcement resource needs under this rule and take thenecessary steps to ensure that appropriate resources are devoted to thiseffort.  Interest in Lifting the Remaining Restrictions on Homework  After the implementation of the certification system in the knitted outerwearindustry, the Department received five petitions with 1,493 signaturesrequesting further deregulation of homework, as well as over 400 lettersfrom individuals and organizations urging that the remaining homework restrictionsbe lifted. Among the reasons for wishing to work at home cited by employeeswere: The desire to be at home to care for their children; the inabilityto afford the costs of child care, transportation, clothing, and meals,if they had to work in a factory; the lack of transportation or the difficultyin commuting from their homes to a factory; the desire to set their ownwork schedules; and the ability to engage in farming operations or otherpursuits while working part-time at home.  Individuals who wrote to the Department regarding the homework restrictionspointed to the inequity and incongruity of the prior regulations whichpermitted the manufacture at home of certain articles of clothing and prohibitedthe manufacture at home of other similar articles of clothing. For example,homeknitters whose employer obtained a certificate could knit sweatersand hats at home, but they could not knit mittens. The extension of thecertification system to the extent practical and appropriate among theremaining restricted industries is intended to reduce these inequities. Except for the 1981 and 1984 revisions to the homework regulations forthe knitted outerwear industry, these regulations have not been substantivelychanged since the early 1940s. The underlying rationale behind the regulatoryrestrictions was that people working in their homes in these industrieswould be more susceptible to abuse and federal minimum wage violations,as well as child labor exploitation. We now know that the Federal (and,in many cases, State) prohibition on homework in these industries did noteliminate such homework. Moreover, in the Department's view, the prohibitionagainst any homework significantly increased the difficulty of locatinghomeworkers and ensuring that they have been properly paid. The ban onhomework reduced an employee's incentive to file a complaint or cooperatein an investigation regarding minimum wage violations, since a substantiatedcomplaint might have led to a loss of the homeworker's job. Unlike thecertificate system, the ban provided no alternative basis for identifyingfirms employing homeworkers. Since homeworker employers operating in therestricted industries were operating in violation of the law simply byemploying homeworkers, these employers had little incentive to comply withthe FLSA wage provisions; if found by the Department, they could be compelledto discontinue their homework operations regardless of any minimum wageor overtime pay violations.  August 1986 Regulatory Proposal  The Department reviewed its experience with the certification system inthe knitted outerwear industry which became effective December 5, 1984,and concluded that such a system was more effective in ensuring compliancewith the minimum wage requirement of the FLSA than was the ban on homework.Accordingly, on August 21, 1986, the Department proposed to adopt a similarcertification system in the remaining restricted industries (51 FR 30036).The comment period was subsequently extended to December 4, 1986 (51 FR37045 as corrected by 51 FR 37296). A total of 19,206 comments were receivedon the August 1986 proposal, of which 8,020 argued in favor of liftingthe ban on homework and 11,186 argued against. Included were 5,814 formletters and post cards opposed to the proposal; 235 form letters in favor.Not included in the above count of comments were 7,648 signatures on petitionsin favor of the proposal and 953 signatures on petitions opposed.  March 1988 Regulatory Proposal  A number of commenters on the August 1986 proposal expressed concerns aboutthe Department's ability to enforce the FLSA with respect to homeworkersin these industries. The Department reviewed its enforcement experiencein knitted outerwear in light of these comments. Based on this review,and to address the concerns raised in the comments, the Department decidedto include in the proposed rule a wider range of enforcement mechanismsto improve FLSA compliance among employers of homeworkers in the restrictedindustries. In addition, the Department decided to propose revisions tothe homework handbook and other recordkeeping requirements in 29 CFR Part516. These revisions to the August 1986 proposal were made in a March 30,1988, proposal (53 FR 10342, as corrected by 53 FR 11590).  Furthermore, with respect to the women's apparel industry, the Departmentdecided to continue to review the potential impact of lifting the ban onhomework and thus withdrew its prior proposal to modify the existing homeworkban in that industry in the March 1988 proposal. The proposal indicatedthat if the Department decided at a later date to lift the ban in women'sapparel, such action would require separate rulemaking. With respect tothe jewelry industry, in the March 1988 proposal, the Department withdrewits proposal to lift the ban on the employment of homeworkers except withrespect to certain jewelry manufacturing operations which it believed donot involve safety and health hazards. Nonhazardous operations were specificallyidentified in the proposal as the stringing of beads and other jewelry,carding, and packaging. While the Department tentatively identified theseoperations as nonhazardous, it recognized that there might be other suchsafe operations. Comment was invited identifying any additional nonhazardousoperations (as well as any operations identified as nonhazardous that mightin fact be hazardous).In the March 1988 notice, the Department also proposed to adopt a policywhereby certain employers who utilize so-called ``model garment programs''would not be subject to any action by the Department simply for employingindividuals who may work at home at times under certain specified conditions.Pursuant to the March 1988 notice, the comment period was reopened to solicitviews on these modifications to the August 1986 proposal. Notice was giventhat all comments received in response to the prior notice would continueto be part of the rulemaking record. These comments were considered inpreparation of this final rule.A total of 2,823 comments were received on the March 1988 proposal, ofwhich 197 argued in favor of lifting the ban on homework and 2,626 arguedagainst. The vast majority of the comments opposed consisted of one ofseveral identical (or virtually identical) form letters.Among the commenters supporting the lifting of the homework ban were fiveState Departments of Labor; American Farm Bureau Federation; National Federationof Independent Business; U.S. Small Business Administration; Federal TradeCommission; several business, civic, and religious groups; and a numberof U.S. Senators and Representatives and other public officials.Among the commenters opposing the lifting of the homework ban were theAFL-CIO and a number of affiliated unions, including the InternationalLadies' Garment Workers' Union (ILGWU), Service Employees InternationalUnion (SEIU), Amalgamated Clothing and Textile Workers Union (ACTWU), andNational Council of Field Labor Lodges (NCFLL); five former Secretariesof Labor and several former Wage and Hour Division officials; 13 StateDepartments of Labor; a large number of religious, civic, and communityorganizations; and a number of U.S. Senators and Representatives and otherpublic officials.Discussion of Issues and Analysis of CommentsThe Department recognizes the deeply-held views on all sides of this complexissue. The strong feelings about the employment of homeworkers were highlyevidenced in the comments, as discussed below.<ITAG tagnum="81">I. Enforcement Mechanisms Proposed in March 1988 and Included in theFinal Rule</ITAG>As indicated above, the March 1988 proposal included a number of additionalenforcement mechanisms. All of these have been incorporated into this finalrule.The additional enforcement mechanisms were developed with the expectationthat, while no single requirement or remedy is likely to ensure compliancewith the FLSA, their impact would be cumulative, and the cumulative impactwould enhance compliance. Among other things it was expected that experiencewith the new requirements would educate employers as to their responsibilitiesunder the FLSA. Employers who understand and are willing to comply withthe requirements of the FLSA in the employment of homeworkers will be ableto do so, and certificates will be revoked and other enforcement mechanismsutilized, as appropriate, where the Department discovers a lack of responsibilityto comply with the Act. Vigorous efforts will simultaneously be taken toenforce the continuing ban with respect to employers without certificates.With the exception of one commenter who questioned the need to retain thefederal ban where it is prohibited under State law, no criticisms of themechanisms were received from commenters favoring lifting of the restrictions.The main criticism of the mechanisms from commenters opposed to the proposalwas that they were not a panacea and could not solve all of the problemsof compliance with the FLSA with respect to homeworkers. No suggestionswere made, however, as to any revisions that could be made to alleviateperceived shortcomings in individual mechanisms. Following is a discussionof each mechanism with any significant comments made on them: <T3>(1) Phase-in of industries.</T3> In order to more efficiently utilizeavailable resources, the certificate program will be phased-in in the remainingrestricted industries on an industry-by-industry basis. This will givethe Department the time to implement the rule in an orderly fashion andallow the Department to conduct investigations of the employers who applyfor certification promptly after the issuance of the certificate, therebyproviding the necessary assistance to enable them to fully comply withthe FLSA from the outset. As set forth in andSection;530.101, the phase-in of the certification programwill take place on a graduated basis, beginning with the gloves and mittensindustry and the embroideries industry, immediately upon the effectivedate of the final rule, and the permissible operations in the jewelry industryand the button and buckle manufacturing and handkerchief manufacturingindustries six months later. Although the certification program is alreadyin place in the knitted outerwear industry, the additional requirementsset forth herein apply upon the effective date of this rule, and new certificateswill need to be obtained in accordance with the provisions. <T3>(2) Issue no certificates in States prohibiting homework. </T3>Priorto the issuance of certificates pursuant to this rule, the Department willcontact those States with statutes which appear to prohibit homework inthe federally-restricted industries in order to confirm whether such homeworkemployment is illegal under State law. The States will be afforded thirtydays in which to reply. In accordance with andSection;530.201, the Departmentwill not issue a certificate authorizing the employment of homeworkerswhere the Governor (or authorized representative) has advised the Administratorin writing that the use of homeworkers in a federally-restricted industryconflicts with a State labor standards or health and safety law. This willavoid any possible confusion for employers in such States and eliminateany potential impact on State agency enforcement efforts. <T3>(3) Regular renewal of certificates. </T3>Section 530.101 providesthat certificates issued to employers of homeworkers in the restrictedindustries will be renewable at two-year intervals. Also, at the time ofapplication and at each renewal, andSection;530.102 requires employers tofurnish the Department with a listing of the names, addresses, and languages(other than English) spoken by the homeworkers that are currently employed(if any) or expected to be employed. Thus, the Department will have anadditional mechanism for close monitoring of certified employers of homeworkersin these industries, and a system for distributing information such ashandbooks and pamphlets. In addition, this requirement will assist theDepartment in assigning bilingual compliance officers to investigationsof such employers. The ILGWU was critical of the requirement that homeworker employers listthe names and addresses of their homeworkers when they apply for a certificate,on the grounds that some employers may not hire homeworkers until afterthey are certified and if they do, they may fail to list them because itwould expose their employment in violation of the FLSA or other statutes.The Department is aware that many employers will apply for certificatesprior to the employment or identification of their homeworkers, in whichcase the employers will not furnish the information until the time of applicationfor renewal of their certificates. In the interim, of course, the employeris required under current recordkeeping requirements to have on file andmake available to the Wage and Hour Division, when requested, the namesand addresses of all employees. This (together with any leads obtained)will continue to be Wage-Hour's primary source of information regardinghomeworkers. The list of homeworkers provided with the certificate applicationwill simply be a convenient means available for Wage-Hour to contact directlythose employees and to learn about languages spoken (for handbooks andinvestigation scheduling). Finally, the Department recognizes that if anemployer decides to operate in violation of labor standards he or she isnot likely to provide an accurate list of employees. The purpose of thecertificate program is to facilitate employment of homeworkers by employerswho wish to comply with the FLSA. There are enforcement remedies availableto deal with those who do not. <T3>(4) Conditions of certification. </T3>To insure that employers of homeworkersare fully aware of their regulatory and statutory obligations in employinghomeworkers, the rule at andSection;530.103 adds a requirement to the processof application for certification that the employer provide written assurancethat all homeworkers will be employed in compliance with the provisionsof the FLSA and all applicable regulations with respect to the paymentof wages, employment of minors, and recordkeeping. The employer must furtherassure compliance with the requirements of Parts 516 and 530 with respectto maintenance of homeworker handbooks and calculation of piece rates,and encourage all homeworkers to cooperate with the Department in any investigationthat may be made. The final rule has been revised to include that employersmust assure that they will instruct homeworkers to accurately fill outhomeworker handbooks and that employers in jewelry manufacturing must assurethat homeworkers will be limited to certain nonhazardous activities.  Several commenters stated that the assurances would have no effect becauseemployers either did not know the requirements of the law or did not observethe number of compensable hours their employees worked at home. The ILGWUcommented that proof of a false assurance would be difficult and that itis inconsistent to require assurance of compliance with the law, implyingknowledge of the law, and then at the same time consider ignorance of thelaw as a factor in assessment of civil money penalties. The majority membersof the House Committee on Education and Labor commented that there is nopenalty for knowingly making a false assurance.The Department views the requirement of employer assurances as primarilya mechanism for assuring that employers are aware of their duties underthe FLSA, and believes that their public acknowledgement of their legalresponsibilities will focus their attention on the law's requirements andhave a deterrent effect on violations. We also anticipate that executionof the assurances will assist the Department in the establishment of willfulor knowing violations for purposes of assessment of civil money penaltiesand collection of back wages and liquidated damages in litigation. Withrespect to the employer's ignorance of the law as a factor in setting civilmoney penalties, the Department recognizes that even conscientious employersmay not be familiar with all the technicalities of the FLSA. As to thecomment of the Committee, if it could be established that an employer gavefalse assurances, ordinarily his or her certificate would be denied orrevoked. Civil money penalties are also available as a sanction againstemployers whose incorrect assurances are not so severe as to warrant denialor revocation of a certificate. Criminal sanctions for false assurancesmay also be available under 18 U.S.C. 1001 in appropriate cases.<T3>(5) Wage-Hour investigation procedures. </T3>Under andSection;530.105,any employer in a restricted industry who requests certification to employhomeworkers will be investigated promptly after the issuance of the certificateby the Department's Wage and Hour Division. Where such an employer is foundto be in violation of the FLSA, corrects the violation(s) and promisesfuture compliance, the firm will be reinvestigated to further assure thatfull FLSA compliance has been achieved.<T3>(6) Improved homeworker handbook. </T3>This rule contains a numberof initiatives to promote the accuracy of hours worked records for allhomeworkers (including those in industries in which homework is not restricted).A simplified homeworker handbook has been developed to enable homeworkersto accurately record daily and weekly hours worked. While the prior handbookrequired a fairly detailed description of work done, e.g., style or lotnumber, article worked on, operation performed, etc., with a single ``hoursworked'' total for each line entry, the new handbook gives primary attentionto accurate recording of daily and weekly hours worked by providing timesheets with sufficient space for a homeworker to log in and out severaltimes a day. The Department believes that this recordkeeping tool moreclosely approximates the reality of the homework situation in that it recognizesthat homeworkers frequently start and stop working a number of times overthe course of a day. The new handbook affords homeworkers a simple meansto record their hours as they work, rather than to reconstruct the hoursworked at the end of the day or week. In addition, in contrast to the priorrule in 29 CFR Part 516 which required that the employer personally enterthe information into the handbook, andSection;516.31(c) requires the employerto insure that the hours worked and other information are accurately enteredby the homeworker.In addition to revising the format of the homeworker handbook, the Departmenthas revised the instructions for filling out the handbook and has includeda brief explanation of what constitutes ``hours worked'' under the FLSA.The new homeworker handbook will be published in several foreign languages,which is expected to reduce enforcement problems associated with languagebarriers. Presently, the Department is making arrangements to translatethe handbook into Spanish, Chinese, Korean, Vietnamese, Cambodian and Laotian.Under the revised homework recordkeeping regulations, employers are requiredto insure that the homeworker handbooks are completed accurately and ina timely fashion. In this regard, andSection;516.31 requires employers tosign a statement in each homeworker handbook that the homeworker was instructedto accurately record all of the required information regarding such homeworker'semployment, and that, to the best of his or her knowledge and belief, theinformation was recorded accurately. The Department believes that the signingof a statement attesting to the validity of the information in the handbookwill encourage the maintenance of accurate records.In addition, a number of clarifying changes have been made to the homeworkrecordkeeping rules in andSection;516.31Several commenters stated two reasons why improved handbooks would notresult in more accurate records of hours worked by homeworkers. They contendthat homeworkers, like other workers, find it inconvenient to write downevery time they start and stop working, particularly at home with frequentinterruptions; and even if they are willing to keep accurate records, fearof retaliation from their employers makes it unlikely that they will turnin records requiring their employers to pay more wages.The Department does not dispute the inconvenience of accurate recordkeepingin the home. This is true, however, not only in the home but also withrespect to virtually every job where employees work by themselves withoutsupervision. It has been the Department's experience that homeworkers didnot understand the handbooks used previously, particularly the need torecord all hours worked. The explanation in the handbook of how to record``hours worked'' in the homework setting will greatly alleviate this problem.Accurate records will also be facilitated by the log in_log out formatand the instructions will provide that the records be kept as the day progresses,rather than reconstructed at a later time_the most difficult problem withrecordkeeping by unsupervised employees. Furthermore, the instructionswill advise that short rest breaks (less than 20 minutes) are hours workedand such breaks need not be recorded.With regard to fear of retaliation, it is anticipated that education ofemployers and employees concerning the consequences of inaccurate records,i.e., that the employer will not be permitted to employ any homeworkers,will encourage accurate recordkeeping. It has been our experience withcertified knitted outerwear employers of homeworkers that most come intocompliance or substantial compliance with the recordkeeping requirementsaffter an initial investigation and explanation of the requirements byWage-Hour compliance officers. Furthermore, employers will be requiredto submit a written assurance that the homeworkers were instructed to accuratelyrecord the required information, and to sign a statement in each handbookthat to the best of the employer's knowledge, the entries in the handbookare accurate.<T3>(7) Piece rates_work measurement.</T3> Experience in enforcement ofthe FLSA with respect to homeworkers has shown that many homeworkers donot earn sufficient amounts at piece rates to meet the minimum wage. Oneapparent reason is that employers have often not set their piece rateshigh enough to insure that all the homeworkers will be paid at least therequired hourly minimum wage. Consequently, as a condition for obtaininga certificate, employers who wish to pay piece rates (as opposed to hourlyrates) to their homeworkers are required under andSection; 530.202 to establishthe piece rates for the different types of items produced using stop watchtime studies or other work measurement methods.The ILGWU commented that it is inconsistent to admit that the Department'scompliance officers had difficulties performing time studies while at thesame time expecting employers to perform them properly. They argued thatthe reasons for the deficiencies in the Department's time studies likewisewould apply to those performed by employers.The Department recognizes that piece rates established by employer timestudies will not provide a measurement of hours worked by employees. Therequirement that employers set piece rates through time studies or otherwork measurement methods is intended to help ensure that employers usea rational basis for setting piece rates. A review of the time studieswill also assist compliance officers in identifying employers whose practicesmust be closely examined to ensure compliance with the Act. For example,if the piece rate is set to yield earnings only slightly above the minimumwage, violations are likely with regard to less skilled employees. Finally,the regulation emphasizes that each worker must always earn at least theminimum wage for all hours worked, even if paid at piece rates.<T3>(8) Denial or revocation of a homework certificate.</T3> Upon findingviolations of the FLSA, the Department has authority under sections 16(c)and 17 of the Act to seek back wages and injunctive relief through courtaction. The Administrator also has the authority, codified in section 11(d)of the Act, to ban homework if that is necessary to insure that homeworkersare not employed in violation of the minimum wage requirements of the Act.Instead of a total ban on homework, under this rule, the administratorwill allow homework in four of the six remaining restricted industriesand to a limited extent in a fifth (jewelry), upon the condition that theemployer obtain a certificate and comply with the requirements of theseregulations. In this regard, another means to obtain compliance with theFLSA is the denial or revocation of a homework certificate upon a determinationby the Administrator of the failure of the applicant or certificate holderto comply with the FLSA, the regulations, and the assurances the applicantmakes as a condition of obtaining a certificate. Since certificate holdershave made certain assurances as a condition of obtaining a certificate,revocation of the certificate is appropriate when the certificate holderdoes not comply with these assurances. Depending on the circumstances,as described in the regulations, a certificate may be denied or revokedfor a period of one to three years.Several comments stated that the specific new criteria for denying or revokinga certificate will not promote the desired effect of increasing FLSA compliancebecause the Department has never fully utilized the remedies it has alwayshad to achieve compliance: Back wage suites, injunction suits against theemployment of homeworkers and denial of certificates in the knitted outerwearindustry. The ILGWU commented that revocation of a certificate is lesslikely to occur under these specific standards than under the prior discretionaryprovisions for denial or revocation of a certificate. Several commentsstated, on the other hand, that the discretion granted the Administratornot to revoke or deny a certificate under certain circumstances where FLSAcompliance is assured means that the denial or revocation standards inthe proposal are not truly mandatory.The Department believes that, given the relatively small number of approximately50 certified knitted outerwear employers in actual operation, the amountof activity in denial or revocation of certificates and in litigation isnot inconsistent with normal enforcement efforts. With regard to the criteriathemselves, the Department believes that enforcement of the Act will bebest achieved by creation of specific standards of revocation and denial.We anticipate that the establishment of mandatory standards for revocationwill be a significant deterrent against violations. The ILGWU comment thatrevocation is less likely than under the prior discretionary standard overlooksthe fact that the rule maintains general discretionary authority in theadministrator to deny or revoke a certificate if employment of homeworkersunder that certificate is likely to result in violation of the FLSA. Thisprovision may be utilized to deny or revoke a certificate in appropriatecircumstances not otherwise subject to one of the specific denial or revocationstandards.With regard to the administrator's discretion not to revoke or deny a certificatewhere the otherwise mandatory criteria have been met, the circumstancesin which such discretion can be exercised are very narrowly circumscribed.It is necessary that the employer not know or have reason to know of theviolations, despite the exercise of due care, that all back wages and civilmoney penalties be paid, and that steps have been taken to prevent recurrence.In our judgement, the purposes of the FLSA and the certificate programare not served by denying or revoking certificates in such circumstances.The Department expects, however, that the cases satisfying the criterianecessary for application of the Administrator's discretion will be infrequent.Finally, the ILGWU commented that the provision requiring denial or revocationof certificates where an employer has discriminated against homeworkersfor engaging in protected activity designed to enforce their rights underthe FLSA was unnecessary because homeworkers don't file complaints withthe Department, because section 15(a)(3) of the FLSA already protects employeesfrom discrimination, and because it is difficult to prove discrimination.In the Department's view, providing protection to employees who seek toenforce their rights is essential to effective administration of the Act.Although such protection is provided already in section 15(a)(3) of theAct, including it in these regulations underscores its importance, andmay also provide an additional deterrent to employers and alleviate someemployees' fear of retailiation.A revision has been made to andSection; 530.205(g) to make it clear thatif an employer fails to maintain the names and addresses of employees,this would be a serious recordkeeping violations and grounds for revocationor denial of a certificate.<T3>(9) Civil money penalties. </T3>Section 530.301 establishes a systemof civil money penalties to be assessed against applicants and certificateholders for any violation of the FLSA related to homework (except childlabor) or for any violation of the homeworker regulations or the assurancesmade thereunder. (Part 579 of this chapter, issued pursuant to section12 of the FLSA provides a separate system of civil money penalties forchild labor violations.) In setting the amount of any penalty assessedunder this rule, the Administrator will take into consideration the numberof homeworkers affected, the history of prior violations, whether a violationwas intentional or knowing, whether a violation was substantial (but notso serious as to warrant revocation of a certificate) or minor in nature,and any mitigating or extenuating circumstances. A schedule is prescribedin the rule for computation of such penalties, up to $500 per affectedhomeworker. Procedures for assessment and administrative hearings are alsoincluded in the rule.Authority for imposition of civil money penalties may be found in section11(d) of the Act, enacted in 1949, which authorizes the Secretary to make``such regulations and orders regulating, restricting, or prohibiting industrialhomework <T3>as are necessary or appropriate </T3>to prevent the circumvention orevasion of and to safeguard the minimum wage rate prescribed in the Act''(emphasis added). Even before this provision was added to the Act the SupremeCourt upheld, in <T3>Gemsco </T3>v. <T3>Walling, </T3>324 U.S. 244 (1945), the Wage-Hour Administrator's authorityto prohibit, outright, the practice of industrial homework, where the statuteauthorized the prescription in industry wage orders of ``such terms andconditions as the Administrator finds necessary * * * to safeguard theminimum wage rates * * *''.By the same rationale, section 11(d) authorizes the Secretary to imposeremedies short of outright prohibition, namely civil money penalties, wherethis is a reasonable alternative to prohibition, and reasonably necessaryor appropriate to safeguard payment of the minimum wage to homeworkers.(See also <T3>Janik Paving andamp; Construction, Inc. </T3>v. <T3>Brock, </T3>828 F.2d 84 (2nd Cir. 1987) wherein it was held that theSecretary is authorized to debar contractors under the Contract Work Hoursand Safety Standards Act, pursuant to statutory authority ``to prescribeappropriate standards, regulations, and procedures * * * with respect tocompliance with the enforcement of such labor standards, as he deems desirable,''following <T3>Steuart andamp; Bro. </T3>v. <T3>Bowles, </T3>322 U.S. 398 (1944).) As in <T3>Gemsco, </T3>the Secretary's utilization of a specially tailored remedypursuant to this rule is necessitated by the special enforcement problemsposed by industrial homework, where these problems cannot be readily resolvedby the use of more routine back wage or injunctive remedies, yet the violationsare not deemed to warrant revocation of the certificate.The Department views the civil money penalty provisions of this rule asan important enforcement tool to encourage employers of homeworkers topay not less than the minimum wage and overtime pay as required by theAct, and to keep proper records as required by the regulations. This devicewill be used in those instances when revocation of a certificate seemsinappropriate or unduly harsh under the circumstances of the violations.The civil money penalty system permits the imposition of relatively moderateadministrative remedies for violations of recordkeeping requirements andfor operating without certificates in situations where substantial backwages are not found to be due homeworkers. Full due process will be affordedto employers through prescribed administrative appeal procedures as discussedbelow.A former Wage and Hour official stated that such penalties were tried unsuccessfullyin the migrant farm labor area, but that employers just disappeared ratherthan face enforcement of the penalties.The Department views migrant farm labor employment conditions, generallyinvolving transient farm labor contractors, as providing no valid comparisonwith homework employment by certified employers. In the event an employerwith a homeworker certificate fails to pay a civil money penalty, thisfinal rule requires revoking the certificate. The Department views civilmoney penalties as an intermediate remedy for those violations of the FLSAwhich are not so severe as to require revocation of a certificate. In theenforcement of the FLSA, the Department has had experience with many typesof employers who disappear, seek relief under the bankruptcy laws to avoidthe payment of back wages, or refuse compliance with the Act.<T3>(10) Administrative procedures. </T3>The final rule in Subpart E, andSection;andSection;530.401 through 530.414, provides an administrative process for reviewof a determination to deny or revoke a homework certificate and for reviewof a decision to assess a civil money penalty. The procedures include aright to a hearing before an Administrative Law Judge and an appeal ofthe Judge's decision to the Secretary.Special procedures are included at andSection; 530.411 for an expedited proceedingwhen a hearing has been requested following a determination to revoke acertificate on an emergency basis. In the case of a request for such ahearing, special time limits are provided for the Administrative Law Judgeto hold a hearing and issue a decision, and for the Secretary to issuea final decision.The final rule at andSection;530.410 also provides an informal procedurebefore the Administrator in lieu of a formal hearing before an AdministrativeLaw Judge. This procedure is to be used when an applicant or certificateholder does not contest the factual findings of the Administrator and waivesa formal hearing.The House Committee on Education and Labor argued that it is inconsistentfor the Department to create expedited procedures in this proposed andat the same time to be on record as opposed to the time frames for administrativeproceedings in the Committee's bill to amend the Davis-Bacon Act, H.R.2216.There are significant differences between the expedited administrativeprocedures in andSection;530.411 and those contemplated by the legislation.The Department anticipates that the number of administrative hearings andappeals resulting from the Committee's Davis-Bacon bill would be far greaterthan the number of cases subject to the administrative procedures of thisrule. Expedited procedures for routine Davis-Bacon cases would place agreat burden on the resources of the Department, at the expense of othercases, whereas the expedited procedures of this rule are not expected tobe invoked frequently. Unlike the Davis-Bacon bill, the expedited proceduresin these regulations are not invoked for routine cases, but only in emergencieswhere the Administrator determines that immediate revocation is necessaryto safeguard the payment of minimum wages to homeworkers.<T3>(11) Bonding or security payments. </T3>Section 530.104 authorizesthe Administrator to require employers to furnish a bond or cash securitypayment as a condition for issuance or renewal of a certificate. Such bondwill be compulsory prior to issuance or renewal of a certificate in thecase of any employer whose application for a certificate has previouslybeen denied, or whose certificate has previously been revoked. Such bondor cash payment will be in an amount up to $2500 for each homeworker tobe employed under a certificate, and will be subject to payment or forfeiturein the event the employer fails to pay any minimum wages or overtime paydue homeworkers. The Administrator will disburse any sums thus paid orforfeited to affected homeworkers in accordance with the procedures setforth in section 16(c) of the FLSA. The Department considers a bonding or security requirement to be a significantenforcement tool which will not only provide a strong incentive for employersto pay homeworkers the minimum wage and overtime pay required by the FLSA,but also assure that in the event of nonpayment, funds will be availableto satisfy the employer's back wage obligations.In order to avoid unnecessary burdens on law-abiding employers, bondingwill not be imposed as a routine requirement, but only in instances whereit is questionable, based on Wage-Hour experience with the employers frompast or current investigations, whether they will comply with their legalobligations, or whether money will be available to compensate homeworkersif violations occur. Bonding will be imposed, for example, in cases wherean employer in the past has needed an installment plan to pay the backwages due. In such cases, however, the Administrator may relieve the employerfrom the bonding obligation and refund any amounts held as security whereit is subsequently determined that the employer is in compliance with thelaw and the Administrator is satisfied that the employer will be financiallyable to remedy any back wage violations which may occur.The ILGWU commented that these requirements are not necessary because theDepartment can deny or revoke a certificate for an employer's failure tocomply with the FLSA. The ILGWU also believes that bonding of employersis unlikely to be very useful or occur very often because of the difficultyin making the necessary findings concerning the ability of the employerto meet its obligations under the Act.Under the regulatory scheme, not all first-time wage violations are necessarilyso serious as to require revocation of a certificate, but the circumstancesof those violations or the employer's ability to pay may lead to a conclusionthat a bond is necessary for protection of the employees' wages. Furthermore,where a certificate has been previously denied or revoked, a bond willgenerally be a prerequisite to obtaining a certificate and additional findingswould not be necessary.<ITAG tagnum="81">II. Homework in the women's apparel industry.</ITAG>Many comments were received on the August 1986 proposal opposing the liftingof the ban on homework in the women's apparel industry. The Departmentindicated in the March 1988 notice that it is still carefully reviewingall of the comments submitted on this issue. Accordingly, the August 1986proposal to lift the ban in the women's apparel industry was withdrawn.Should the Department decide to take further action with respect to thisindustry, the March 1988 notice stated that separate rulemaking would beundertaken. Thus, the final rule has no effect on the current restrictionson the employment of homeworkers in the women's apparel industry.<ITAG tagnum="81">III Freedom of choice.</ITAG>The Department received a great many comments from individuals who expresseda strong belief that the freedom to work at home is a basic right and explainedtheir reasons for wanting to work at home: A homworker is free from directsupervision; work schedules can be adjusted to fit individual circumstances;and a homeworker can work at his or her own pace and time, resulting ina more satisfied person and a product of better quality. Several commentersmentioned that homework provided freedom from the noise and crowded conditionsof a factory. Others claimed that the homework ban was unconstitutionalin that it limited their ``pursuit of happiness.'' A number of commentersacknowledged that there are benefits to working outside the home, but thatthe independence and flexibility of working at home outweigh any loss ofthese benefits.In the Department's view, it is desirable for individuals to have the greatestfreedom possible in selecting employment. Thus, the Department feels thatit is appropriate to provide employers and employees the opportunity toarrange for individuals to work out of their homes, provided that the Departmentis able to effectively enforce the provisions of the FLSA and that theworkers are paid in compliance with the Act.<ITAG tagnum="81">IV. Impact on rural areas</ITAG>Many commenters submitted views on the benefits of homework in rural areas.Some of the reasons cited by these commenters for lifting the ban were:1. The agricultural economy is depressed and jobs are scarce; 2. Mass transportation is nonexistent; 3. Travel, especially in winter over rough roads, is difficult; 4. The distance from home to workplace is often considerable, thus makingemployment outside the home difficult and expensive; 5. Day care facilities are few and far between and are expensive whereavailable; 6. Farm wives need to be available for farming activities during the busyparts of the year; and 7. The need for flexibility to perform farm chores at certain times isrequired every day. Several commenters noted that income derived from homework made the diffencebetween holding on to a family farm or having it go under. The Department agrees that homework may be the most viable type of employmentfor certain individuals, and that this is a valid reason for removing therestrictions on homework provided such individuals will be paid in compliancewith the FLSA. <ITAG tagnum="81">V. Impact on local and national economies </ITAG>Many commenters argued that the ban has denied homeworkers opportunitiesto earn a living and thereby caused substantial personal hardships. Theyalso stated that the prior rule impacted adversely on unemployment andproductivity in the restricted industries at a time when imports are erodingtraditional manufacturing bases. Some noted that the 1986 White House Conferenceon Small Business strongly recommended the repeal of the regulations restrictinghomework. Lifting the restrictions, many argued, would encourage the expansionof job opportunities, permit businesses to find ways to reduce costs, provideadditional tax revenues for Federal, State and local governments, and placethe United States in a more competitive position in the global economy.While the Department agrees with the thrust of these comments, no reliabledata are available to confirm any conclusions about the impact of the homeworkrestrictions on employment opportunities or their economic effect on businessesin the restricted industries. Consequently, the Department's decisionsin this rulemaking were not based on any consideratiopn of the net impactof the rule on employment opportunities. Conversely, many clothing and textile manufacturers, associations of manufacturers,the ILGWU, the Amalgamated Clothing and Textile Workers Union, and othersargued that traditional manufacturers cannot compete with employers whouse homeworkers. A number argued that factories cannot compete with manufacturerswho use homemakers because the costs associated with operating a factoryare much greater, that lifting the homework restrictions would cause factoriesto close, and that responsible employers would have to move jobs to employees'homes in order to compete. They also argued that the Department had notconsidered the impact of the proposal on employees in factories. A numberof associations of manufacturers stated that these industries are dyingout as a result of foreign competition. One manufacturers' associationpointed to the consequences of unfair foreign competition on these industriesand argued that the proposal would eliminate protections that now existagainst unfair competition at home. Some argued that the proposal wouldnot produce any growth of employment opportunities, and that any gain inhomeworker employment would be offset by losses in factory employment.Several State Departments of Labor argued that the Department had not consideredthe impact on manufacturers in States that ban homework who will be forcedto compete with homeworker employers in other States and stated that theproposal would undermine their own State enforcement efforts. The Department recognizes that factory manufacturers may pay wages andprovide benefits to their employers in excess of those required by theFLSA. However, the FLSA provides the authority to restrict homework onlyto the extent necessary to safeguard the minimum wage. Many of the concernsabout ``unfair competition'' with homeworker employers relate to higheroperating costs for employers of factory workers. Provided the homeworkersare paid at least minimum wage and required overtime pay, the objectionsraised in the comments concerning ``unfair competition'' are not FLSA mattersand, therefore, are not pertinent to these regulations. Finally, all otherindustries, other than the few restricted industries, have always beenpermitted to use homeworkers and such allegations have not been heard fromthese other industries. In the Department's view, the ban on homework has been only partially effectiveand, thus, factory manufacturers have already been competing to some extentwith employers of homeworkers in the restricted industries just as theyhave been competing in the non-restricted industries. Furthermore, homeworkeremployers in the restricted industries have had little incentive to complywith the FLSA minimum wage and overtime requirements, since their operationshave been illegal under the Act. Under the ban it has been extremely difficultfor the Department to locate and identify homeworkers or to obtain theircooperation in investigations. This problem should be ameliorated undera certification system. Through the Department's efforts to ensure thathomeworkers legally employed by certified employers are paid legal wagesand vigorous enforcement of the FLSA with respect to employers operatingwithout certificates, the competitive position of factory employers shouldnot be substantially impacted and may improve under the certification process.This regulation will have no effect on any existing State restrictionson homework. Thus, under andSection; 530.201, homework in these industrieswill continue to be prohibited under this rule in those States where, andto the extent that, State officials advise the Department that homeworkis restricted by State laws and rules. The fact that such State restrictionsmay work to the disadvantage of local factory manufacturers in competitionwith those in States who might utilize homeworkers in compliance with theFLSA is not an FLSA issue. <ITAG tagnum="81">VI. Need for homework restrictions</ITAG>Many commenters in favor of the proposed argued that while the regulationsrestricting homework might have been necessary when they were promulgatedin the 1940's, the restrictions are obsolete and contrary to the needsof today's workers. As discussed above, some of these commenters pointedout inconsistencies in the prior rule, in that homework was prohibitedin some industries but not others. The Department appreciates the difficulty the public has in understandingwhy restrictions on the use of homeworkers should apply in certain industries,but not others. After the enactment of the FLSA, homework in certain industrieswas believed by the Department to be a threat to maintaining labor standards.A series of public hearings extending from 1941 through 1943 was held forseven industries in which homework was most prevalent and in which FLSAviolations were believed to be a serious problem. As a result of thesehearings, restrictions on the employment of homeworkers in the seven industries(including knitted outerwear) were established by regulation. Today, with the growth of homework in other industries (such as telemarketingand word processing), the application of such restrictions to only a fewspecific industries is easily perceived as an anomaly which is hard tounderstand without the historical background and the appreciation thatthe prior rules remained essentially unchanged for over forty years. Commenters opposed to the proposal pointed to the impediments to achievingFLSA compliance with respect to homeworker in these industries that wereidentified by the Administrator in the 1940's, and argued that nothinghad changed over the years to diminish these impediments. Many commentersargued that certification of homeworkers employers would not work becauseonly a handful of employers (those that are law-abiding) would seek toobtain certificates. In the Department's view, the latter argument is precisely the point inpermitting employers to obtain certificates to employ homeworkers. It isanticipated that, as a general matter, employers who come forward and identifythemselves and agree to open their records to inspection, do, in fact,intend to comply with the law. It is to these and only these employersthat this rule has any application. While the Wage-Hour Administrator in 1942 concluded that a ban on homeworkwas needed to protect homeworkers, it is evident that the 45-year ban didnot eliminate homework. During those years the ban on homework fosteredan underground, unchecked homework industry in which enforcement of minimumwage and overtime pay requirements has been very difficult. Employers ofsuch homeworkers had little reason to comply with the FLSA (or meet anyother Federal or State standards) since their operations were illegal underthe FLSA in any event. In the Department's view, the certification systemand enforcement mechanisms incorporated in the final rule are preferableand reasonable alternatives to a total ban. <ITAG tagnum="81">VII. Homework permits individuals to combine work and family obligations</ITAG>Among commenters in favor of the proposal, the flexibility provided byhomework to combine work and family obligations was second only to the``freedom'' issue as a reason to adopt the proposal. The consensus of thesecommenters was that working at home would enable parents to earn moneyand care for their children without incurring expenses for child care,transportation, or clothing suitable for work outside the home; would provideincome opportunities for senior citizens and handicapped persons; wouldenable people to earn money and care for sick or elderly family members;and would help remove single parents from welfare rolls and place themin the work force. One commenter questioned the fairness of the government'sprohibiting people from working at home, supporting themselves, and payingtaxes, and at the same time paying out welfare funds for such people tostay home and be supported by taxpayers. Several people commented thathomeworkers can earn less per hour than they would for the same work outsidethe home and still come out ahead because they have no child care, transportation,or clothing costs. The Department would point out that elderly and handicapped persons whoare unable to adjust to factory work and persons required to remain athome to care for invalids were permitted under the prior rule to work athome with individual certificates. In other respects the Department sharesthe concerns of these commenters, provided that the Department is ableto assure compliance with the Act. <ITAG tagnum="81">VIII. Homework in the jewelry industry </ITAG>Many comments were received on the August 21, 1986, proposal opposing thelifting of the ban on jewelry homework based on safety and health issues.Specifically, the SEIU and other commenters expressed the opinion thatpermitting homework in the jewelry industry could impose a grave dangerto the health and safety of workers, their families and the community.They alleged that a number of the processes involved in jewelry manufacturingexpose workers to toxic fumes and acids, many of which are known cancer-causingagents or are harmful to the reproductive processes. It was also arguedthat significant fire hazards and the potential for explosions are presentdue to the use of flammable solvents, propane tanks and acetylene torches.Comments in favor of lifting the ban on jewelry homework argued that itsretention would result in loss of jobs, thereby exacerbating already depressedemployment situations in certain parts of the country.The Department carefully considered the comments submitted on this issue.In light of the potential for very serious safety and health hazards forhomeworkers in the jewelry industry, and the Secretary's broad and multi-facetedresponsibility for protecting and promoting the welfare of working peoplegenerally (29 U.S.C. 551), and in view of the potential adverse impacton the public at large, the March 1988 notice withdrew the Department'sprior proposal to lift the ban on this industry except with regard to operationsdetermined not to involve safety and health standards, and the notice indicatedthat the restrictions on other homework would be retained. Since therewas no evidence in the rulemaking record of safety and health hazards injewelry assembly operations limited to the stringing of beads and otherjewelry, carding and packaging operations, and since a number of commentssubmitted on the August 1986 proposal advocated that homework should bepermitted in such operations, the Department proposed in March 1988 thatthe ban be lifted with respect to such operations.One jewelry manufacturer commented in favor of the proposed rule, statingthat its operations are in accordance with its provisions. In addition,the Small Business Administration alleged that the rule is so restrictivethat virtually all jewelry manufacturing is excluded, and stated that theproposal does not contain sufficient information to support its conclusion.However, neither the SBA nor any other commenter provided any informationor suggestions in support of a broader rule.The SEIU submitted subsequent comments opposed to the limited certificationprogram in the jewelry industry. Among the issues raised, they stated thatthe terms ``carding and packaging'' as used in the industry include operationswhich could be hazardous in a home environment such as the use of industrialglues and epoxies for mounting backs or stems on earings and the use ofheating elements to seal plastic wrapping. To avoid any such effect, andSection;530.101(a) clarifies that ``carding and packaging'' operations may includethe use of common household glues available to the general public but donot include potentially hazardous operations such as the use of industrialglues, epoxies or heating elements. Also, andSection; 530.103 has been amendedto require employers in this industry to provide written assurances thattheir homeworkers will be exclusively engaged in the permitted operations.<ITAG tagnum="81">IX. Enforcement experience in the knitted outerwear industry</ITAG>Commenters in favor of the 1986 and 1988 proposals argued that the enforcementexperience in knitted outerwear under the certification program had provento be an effective means of ensuring employers' compliance with the FLSA.Many of these commenters expressed the view that the lifting of the bantogether with the certification requirement would eliminate the fear ofjob loss for homeworkers who would, therefore, feel free to file complaintsof wage underpayments with the Department.The Department agrees that FLSA enforcement among employers of homeworkersin the knitted outerwear industry has been more effective under the certificationprogram than under the prior ban. The certification program has identifiedhomeworker employers in the industry, permitted employers who wished tocomply with the FLSA and employ knitted outerwear homeworkers a legal avenueto do so, and provided an incentive for employees and employers to furnishthe Department with information about other companies in the industry operatingwithout certificates.The Department has identified far more knitted outerwear employers of homeworkersthan was possible under the prior restrictions. The certification programestablished a channel of enforcement and public information to a segmentof the knitted outerwear industry that was largely out of reach under theprior restrictions. Without this program, it is likely that many of theknitted outerwear firms investigated would not have been contacted by theDepartment.By contrast, many of the commenters opposed to the 1986 and 1988 proposalspresented a sharply critical view of the Department's investigations ofknitted outerwear manufacturers under the certification program. The thrustof these comments was that these investigations demonstrated that the Departmentdid not and could not properly enforce the FLSA.The ILGWU submitted a lengthy narrative discussion on each of the two proposals.Accompanying each of these submissions was a separate volume of attachments(photos, affidavits, etc.). In addition a private consulting firm's analysisof Wage-Hour time studies was submitted. Also submitted were 57 appendixvolumes consisting of reproductions of Wage-Hour files and documents providedthe ILGWU in response to requests for disclosure under the Freedom of InformationAct.The Department recognizes the extraordinary levels of effort and resourcesthe ILGWU expended in analyzing the disclosable portions of the knittedouterwear files and preparing comments on these investigations. The majorissues raised in the ILGWU comments on the knitted outerwear enforcementprogram are discussed below.The ILGWU argued that the Department's identification of approximately665 homeworkers in the knitted outerwear industry between 1984 and 1986does not establish its ability to identify and locate the remainder ofthe universe of homeworkers in that industry. The union concluded thatthis inability to locate homeworkers would be exacerbated if the certificationsystem were extended to the remaining restricted industries due to an anticipatedgrowth of illegal homework in those industries. Few employers of homeworkersin these industries, they submit, would obtain certificates, because asa regular practice such employers pay their homeworkers subminimum wagesand would not expose this practice to the Department.In fact, only those employers who come forward and identify themselvesthrough the certification procedure are affected by this rule. Those employerswho fail to obtain certificates will remain subject to the restrictionson the use of homeworkers applicable under the prior rule. The impact ofthe new regulations is neutral with respect to employers of homeworkerswho operate outside the certification system. Lifting the restrictionson those employers who do obtain certificates should not lead to an increasein illegal homework. The Department will continue its efforts to locateand investigate illegal homework and obtain compliance with the law.The ILGWU argued that many of the knitted outerwear investigation fileswere deficient in that the compliance officers did not follow three Wage-HourField Operations Handbook (FOH) ``mandates'' for homework investigations,namely, records review, time studies, and interviews. In comments submittedon the 1986 proposal, the ILGWU also argued that based on a review of investigatoryrecords, the Department disregarded or overlooked evidence of monetaryviolations involving seven certified employers, and understated violationsinvolving five others.The Department carefully reviewed its enforcement experience in knittedouterwear based on these and other comments. As a result of this review,the Department conducted training in the Summer of 1987 of its Wage-Hourcompliance officers concerning enforcement techniques to use in such investigations.A review of investigations conducted since the training was completed disclosedsome errors in knitted outerwear files. However, the Department does notagree with the ILGWU assessment of the overall success of the knitted outerwearinvestigation program under the certification process, in comparison withthe success of the prior total ban on homework in that industry. It hasbeen the Department's experience that compliance has improved as certifiedemployers are further educated about the requirements of the Act.The ILGWU claims are based primarily on assumptions concerning the lackof investigation file documentation in the areas of wage and handbook transcription,interviews, time spent in setting up and putting away equipment and materials,and employee expenses. While compliance officers are expected to followFOH guidance in the conduct of homework investigations, these instructionsare not intended to be ``mandates'' in all cases. It is generally understoodthroughout the Wage and Hour Division and by the public that considerablejudgment and discretion is to be used by compliance officers in determiningthe amount of factfinding to devote to a case and selecting the most appropriateinvestigation techniques to apply. Many of the decisions made by complianceofficers must be made on the spot in view of the particular circumstancesof a case.Furthermore, an investigation file is merely a record of the complianceofficer's findings and conclusions about an investigation and, as explainedbelow, does not present a comprehensive picture of all the records whichwere reviewed or all the questions which were asked in employee interviews.Thus, while compliance officers are expected to review records of hoursof work, they are not, contrary to the ILGWU assertion, expected to include<T3>transcribed</T3> records in the investigation file unless there issome reason to do so, e.g., to illustrate or document minimum wage andovertime pay violations. Similarly, while oral interviews of employeesare normally taken, field staff are not in any way expected to take a verbatimtranscription of everything discussed with an employee.To an outside observer it may appear that portions of the investigationprocess were omitted in error while it is likely that a judgment was madethat further factfinding was not necessary in order to make determinationconcerning the employer's status of compliance. For example, where it isclear that employees earn well in excess of the minimum wage, details concerningthe time spent in setting up are not necessary. For these reasons, theDepartment believes the ILGWU conclusions about the ``mandates'' relatingto knitted outerwear investigations are overstated.Several commenters, including a consultant retained by the ILGWU, arguedthat time studies cannot be used by Wage-Hour as a tool to determine FLSAcompliance in homeworker investigations. They pointed out that it is impossibleto study every style produced or to insure that the styles time-studiedare, in fact, the more difficult patterns. They also stated that time studiesonly result in approximations of the average time required by employeesto produce a given style and do not take into account vast differencesin the skill levels of employees. They also argued that the time studiesconducted in the knitted outerwear investigations were not used effectively.In the Department's view, compliance officer time studies (which are nowmore accurately termed ``work observations'') can serve as a tool in homeworkerinvestigations in confirming or negating information obtained from employerrecords, homeworker handbooks, homeworker interviews, and other sources.However, compliance determinations cannot be and are not based solely onwork observations in any type of investigation, including homework investigations.Furthermore, upon review of its experience in knitted outerwear investigations,the Department has concluded it is not necessary or appropriate to conductwork observations in all homeworker investigations or to observe the workof each homeworker. For example, where records and interviews otherwiseclearly indicate compliance, and where there is no reason to suspect falsification,work observations serve little, if any, purpose. Where, for example, anemployee works part-time and clearly earns in excess of the minimum wage,there is no need to ascertain whether a certain item takes forty or fiftyminutes to make or whether the employee is earning $8.00 or $8.25 an hour.All that is necessary is to determine that the employee is paid at leastthe minimum wage for each hour of work. This is a matter of judgment anddiscretion by the compliance officers and their supervisors, based on thefacts and circumstances of a given case.<ITAG tagnum="81">X. Enforcement Resources</ITAG>Many commenters on the August 1986 proposal argued that the Department'sresources (approximately 900 compliance officers) were inadequate to enforcethe FLSA in the restricted industries. Most of these commenters pointedto the relatively small size of the knitted outerwear industry in comparisonwith the women's apparel industry. Many argued that the annual inspectionprogram in knitted outerwear could not be carried over to the remainingindustries without draining resources away from non-homework investigationsof all other industries, as well as homework investigations of unscrupulousemployers who do not obtain certificates. A number of commenters pointedto a GAO report finding of a 20 percent reduction in compliance officerstaff years between 1980 and 1984 and the addition of 7.5 million coveredState and local government workers as a result of the decision in <T3>Garcia</T3> v. <T3>San Antonio Metropolitan Transit Authority et al.</T3> (<T3>Garcia</T3>), 469 U.S. 528 (1985). In response to the March 1988 proposalsome argued that the 20 additional compliance officer staff years includedin the 1989 Budget for homework enforcement is inadequate.Since it is presently illegal to employ homeworkers in the restricted industries,there are no reliable estimates as to the number of such homeworkers. Basedon the 1980 census, the Bureau of the Census estimates that there are 8,711homeworkers in the six industries (including women's apparel). The Bureauof Labor Statistics places the figure at approximately 122,000. Both studieshave certain limitations in their effectiveness in identifying homeworkersin the precise industries restricted by the prior rule. However, assumingthat, in fact, 122,000 homeworkers are employed in the six industries,the size of the work force is a very small fraction of the total numberof workers subject to the FLSA minimum wage, which is estimated at 73 million.Moreover, while precise data are not available, it is likely that relativelyfew of these homeworkers are in the industries affected by this rule andin States which permit such homework.Furthermore, contrary to these comments, the number of Wage-Hour complianceofficers has not dropped sharply since 1980:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s25,10</C> <H1>Date</H1><H1>On board compliance officers</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Sept. 30, 1980<D>1,059</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Sept. 30, 1981<D>953</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Sept. 30, 1982<D>914</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Sept. 30, 1983<D>928</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Sept. 30, 1984<D>916</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Sept. 30, 1985<D>950</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Sept. 30, 1986<D>908</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Sept. 30, 1987<D>951</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Sept. 30, 1988<D>\1\ 985</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Sept. 30, 1989<D>\1\ 1,028</D><F>\1\ Estimated.</F></ITAG></ITAG>The workload impact of the <T3>Garcia</T3> decision has not strained available compliance officerstaff resources. For example, in FY 1987 the Wage and Hour Division receiveda total of only 1,300 complaints from State and local government workerswhile 62,000 were received from workers in the private sector.The NCFLL asserts that the Wage and Hour Division program operational planinhibits the ability of compliance officers to conduct homeworker investigations,contending that homeworker investigations require significantly more timethan other Wage and Hour investigations. The Department has recognizedthat homeworker investigations require more compliance officer investigationtime. The request for additional compliance officer resources was basedon the Department's estimate that the typical homeworker investigationrequires 35 hours to complete, compared to 20-22 hours as an average forall other FLSA investigations. In addition, it is important to note thatprogram operational plans establish production goals for field offices,not individual compliance officers. The plan is based on average investigationtime and recognizes that some investigations require more time than others.It is the Department's view that the additional compliance officer resourcesrequested in the 1989 Budget will provide sufficient resources to conductan effective enforcement program in the restricted industries. Within currentresources, the Department has been able to conduct approximately 375 homeworkerinvestigations annually. The additional compliance officers will permitan increase in the number of investigations to 1,150, more than triplethe current level. While a higher percentage of covered homeworker employersare investigated than are employers in many other enforcement programs,the Department believes that the devotion of a higher level of resourcesis warranted.Whether the Department has sufficient resources to investigate homeworkeremployers certified under this rule will depend, in part, on the numberof employers who request certificates and the level of compliance withthe FLSA such employers achieve and maintain. Also, while the Departmentdoes not anticipate any increase in illegal homework, it recognizes thatadditional leads may also require the use of additional resources to vigorouslyenforce the FLSA with respect to uncertified employers. The resources neededmay change over time and will be examined regularly (as they are presentlyexamined for all Wage and Hour Division activities). As necessary, theDepartment will include additional resources in its budget requests. Thefact that the Department cannot identify the precise resource impact ofpermitting a relatively small number of employees to work at home is nota valid reason to ban such work.<ITAG tagnum="81">XI. Rate of violations</ITAG>Many commenters argued that adoption of the proposal would result in widespreadFLSA violations. Some stated that lifting the ban would be an abdicationof the Department's statutory responsibility to workers in these industriesbecause such action would foster FLSA violations. Others argued that childrenwould be used to help increase the family income by doing some of the work,to the detriment of their studies.The Department believes that the FLSA itself provides strong safeguardsto assure compliance by employers generally, including homeworker employers.Specifically, the Secretary has authority to assess civil money penaltiesfor child labor violations, to file lawsuits to compel compliance throughinjunctions and obtain the payment of back wages, and to pursue criminalpenalties through the U.S. Justice Department.The Department also believes that the certification program will fosterFLSA compliance to a greater extent than occurred under the homework banamong those employers who will come forward to obtain certificates. Mostimportantly, such employers will have a new incentive to comply with theFLSA, namely, the opportunity to operate legally. Under the prior rulesuch employers had little incentive to comply since their operations wereillegal irrespective of any wages paid or compliance with child labor rules.The Department also agrees with commenters (both in favor of and opposedto the proposals) that generally only those employers who intend to paytheir homeworkers properly will come forward to obtain certificates. Aspreviously pointed out, only those who do so are affected by this rule.Employers who do not obtain certificates remain subject to the ban on homework.Moreover, the final rule incorporates significant enforcement mechanismsto address commenters' concerns about the difficulty of enforcing the FLSAamong employers of homeworkers. The Department believes, since the banhas been ineffective in eliminating homework, on balance, the more effectivemeans to achieve FLSA compliance for homeworkers in these industries isto implement the strong new enforcement mechanisms in this rule for employerswho seek to comply with the FLSA and come forward to obtain certificates,rather than to continue the ban on such employment. The prior rule didnot eliminate homework, foreclosed opportunities to work at home legally,fostered an underground homework industry comprised of employers with littleincentive to comply with FLSA standards, and reduced the likelihood thatthe Department would identify homeworkers and monitor their activities.<ITAG tagnum="81">XII. Inadequate Recordkeeping</ITAG>Many commenters argued that no methods exist to accurately measure hoursworked by homeworkers, that the sporadic and unsupervised nature of homeworkprecludes any accurate or complete recordkeeping, and that it is too easyfor employers to falsify hours records on homeworkers. Some argued thathomeworkers underestimate their actual hours of work (and thus overstatetheir earnings per hour) in order to avoid ``make-up'' pay needed to providedthem with the minimum wage and thus eliminate the risk of losing theirjobs. The ILGWU quoted the Department's 1959 report on homework: ``It isto the advantage of the employer to maintain inadequate records of theiremployees' wages and hours. Any attempt to reconstruct hours or wages inthe absence of required records in many cases is an exercise in futility.''The Department agrees that recordkeeping has been a common problem areaamong employers of homeworkers. However, compliance officers over the yearshave conducted a variety of non-homeworker investigations where recordsare inaccurate, incomplete, or nonexistent, where employees work at multiplelocations, and where wages are paid based on piece rates. In the constructionindustry, for example, it is common to find so-called ``independent contractors''paid so much per square foot of wall-board or so much per square foot ofroofing. Similar recordkeeping problems are common with respect to taxicabdrivers, home service and repair workers, resident managers, maintenanceengineers, irrigation installation and repair workers, insurance adjusters,and other employees subject to unscheduled ``on-call'' work outside theirnormal workday.Furthermore, many Wage and Hour investigations involve employees whoseemployers incorrectly assume they are exempt pursuant to FLSA section 13(a)(1)and 29 CFR 541 as ``managers'', administrative personnel, or other salariedwhite collar workers. Frequently, such employees work outside normal schedules,including working at home, and there are no records of hours worked. Thus,the problems of recordkeeping and the need to reconstruct hours are not,by any means, unique to homeworker cases.Experience in the initial round of investigations under the knitted outerwearcertification program showed a high rate of recordkeeping violations, asdiscussed in the ILGWU comments. The high percentage of employers withrecordkeeping violations closely parallels the Department's historic experiencewith homeworker employers as cited by a number of commenters.However, the effectiveness of the homeworker certification program in fosteringimproved recordkeeping should not be measured on the basis of the initialinvestigations of certified employers as the ILGWU contended. The Department'sinitial investigations of knitted outerwear employers immediately followingcertification covered time periods largely or entirely prior to the employers'certifications. (Investigations generally covered a two-year period fromthe last payroll completed before the opening of the investigation.)A better measurement of the effectiveness of the certification programin improving recordkeeping by employers using homeworkers is to be foundin the status of recordkeeping compliance in investigations subsequentto the initial one. In fact, both the number and severity of recordkeepingviolations found in the reinvestigations of certified employers have beenreduced from those found in the initial investigations. Most certifiedemployers substantially improved their recordkeeping compliance (or cameinto full compliance) once the relatively complex recordkeeping rules peculiarto homeworker employers were adequately explained. Under this rule, certifiedemployers of homeworkers have an incentive to keep proper records thatuncertified employers do not have, namely, the desire to retain their certification.Thus, the Department believes that homeworkers are better protected underthe certification program than under the prior ban.Unquestionably, determining hours worked is an important aspect of anyinvestigation where accurate time records have not been kept. Though burdensome,it is not an impossible task. Wage and Hour compliance officers have beentrained to make determinations of hours worked by employees in their normalday-to-day investigations through the use of employee interviews and othertechniques. Moreover, since the FLSA was enacted, the courts have placedgreat weight on the Administrator's estimates of the hours worked in calculatingback wages. Inaccurate or missing records have provided little defenseto employers who objected to the size of such estimates. (See, for example,<T3>Anderson</T3> v. <T3>Mt. Clemens Pottery Co.,</T3> 328 U.S. 680 (1946) and <T3>Donovan</T3> v. <T3>Grantham,</T3> 690 F.2d 453 (5th Cir. 1982).) The FLSA provides penalties,including injunctive relief, for continued recordkeeping violations. Thefinal rule includes civil money penalties and certificate revocation astools for the Department to improve compliance in this area by certifiedhomeworker employers.The Department believes the regulatory changes put into effect by thisrule will improve the accuracy of recordkeeping by certified homeworkeremployers, as well as homeworker employers in all the unrestricted industries.The homeworker handbook has been simplified to facilitate recording ofdaily and weekly hours worked. The revised handbook includes instructionsfor filling it out and a brief explanation of what constitutes ``hoursworked'' under the FLSA. The handbook will be available in English andsix foreign languages. Finally, the recordkeeping rules (29 CFR 516) havebeen revised to clarify the types of information to be kept and to requireemployers to insure that homeworkers make the required entries into thehandbooks.<ITAG tagnum="81">XIII. Language Barriers and the Widespread Use of Immigrants</ITAG>A great many commenters pointed to the widespread employment of immigrantsin the restricted industries as a basis for maintaining the ban. Some arguedthat because of language differences and other social barriers, newly-arrivedimmigrants are not fully aware of their rights, and are especially vulnerableto manipulation and abuse. Others stated that language barriers effectivelywould eliminate the Department's ability to interview and do time studiesand pointed out that the prior homeworker handbook, as discussed above,was not generally available in languages other than English. Many commentersargued that illegal aliens are often employed as homeworkers and that suchworkers will not complain to the Department out of fear of deportation.The Department has to deal with language barriers as part of its overallenforcement activities under all the various laws it administers, and inall types of industries. Even if this rule were not implemented, the challengeof language barriers would remain in investigations of employers of homeworkersboth in these industries and in the unrestricted industries, and of factoryemployers. The ban imposed under the prior rule offered no assistance inaddressing the problem of language barriers among homeworkers in any industry(restricted or not restricted). By contrast, this rule requires that certifiedemployers provide the Department with information about the languages spokenby their employees. Advance steps can be taken, therefore, to insure thatcompliance officer staff who have the necessary language skills are assignedto conduct these investigations. The Wage and Hour Division has extensivebilingual capabilities, with approximately one-fourth of the current fieldstaff having some proficiency in one or more languages other than English.However, when a compliance officer does not possess the language skillsrequired in a particular investigation, a variety of other sources is used,including Federal, State, and local governments, and service organizations.Furthermore, as indicated above, arrangements are being made to print anddistribute the new homework handbooks in Spanish, Chinese, Korean, Vietnamese,Cambodian, and Laotian. On balance, the Department believes the certificationprogram in this rule provides more tools to address language barriers withrespect to homeworkers of certified employers than did the ban under theprior rule.There are a great number of industries in which illegal aliens have beenemployed (e.g., factories, restaurants, agriculture, construction, maintenanceand service industries) and the same challenges apply to investigationsin these industries.Furthermore, the Immigration Reform and Control Act (IRCA) of 1986 addressesthese problems by providing civil money penalties for employers of illegalaliens and criminal penalties under certain circumstances. (The Wage andHour Division is responsible for making inspections of certain employerrecords under IRCA and providing information to the Immigration and NaturalizationService.) It seems apparent that unscrupulous employers who employ illegalaliens as homeworkers at substandard wages will not apply for certificationand thus will not be affected by this rule. Such employers will continueto be subject to the ban on homework as under the prior rule. On the otherhand, employers who apply for certificates, the only employers affectedby this rule, are likely to avoid hiring illegal aliens because of thepossible exposure of such workers to a Federal Government agency whichhas inspection functions under IRCA within its assigned area of responsibility.Therefore, in the Department's view, this rule is more effective, on balance,than the prior ban in addressing the issue of illegal alien employmentand exploitation. Model Garment Programs Home sewing retailers (fabric stores) have for some time conducted modelgarment programs, which have been found to be in violation of the FLSAhomework restrictions. Typical model garment programs involve employees of retail fabric storesmaking garments in their homes for display in the stores. While there are many variations, usually the employee is given free patterns,notions and materials, and is allowed to keep the garment after the displayperiod, which usually lasts three to six weeks. Such programs are voluntary,and the employee typically has wide discretion in selecting patterns, fabricsand notions. Such display garment programs are considered beneficial by employers andemployees. The employees find the program beneficial because many of themare enthusiastic home sewers. The display garment programs are of advantageto consumers because they can see finished products. The employers arepleased since they can display model garments_which are constructed withpersonal care_to their customers. The Department believes that a special provision is appropriate for modelgarment programs and, therefore, in the March 1988 notice proposed to adopta policy whereby the Department would not take any action in situationswhere certain criteria are met. The Department received no comments specificallyopposed to the adoption of a special policy for model garment programs.However, a number of comments argued that the policy should be incorporatedinto the text of the regulation, and that the employer should not be requiredto (1) provide all materials at no cost, (2) pay the employee for the timespent making the garment, and, at the same time, (3) permit the employeeto keep the garment after the display period. The Department believes it is generally not appropriate to incorporatespecial enforcement policies in the text of regulations. However, the policyregarding model garment programs will be included in the Wage and HourDivision's procedural instructions to field enforcement staff, and informationregarding this policy will be available to representatives of the industryand the general public. In addition, the Department agrees that employersin such programs should be permitted to charge the employees for the employer'scost of materials (e.g., patterns, fabrics, notions) used in producingthe garments, since this policy requires that the employee retain the modelgarment. It must be emphasized that time spent by employees in sewing model garmentsis hours worked under the FLSA and that such hours must be combined withhours worked at the establishment in recording the total hours in the workweekand calculating the payment of the minimum wage and overtime pay. The enforcementpolicy applies only where: (1) The employees' work is voluntary; (2) The materials (e.g., patterns, fabrics, and notions) are provided tothe employees free or at no more than their cost to the employer; (3) The employees retain ownership of the model garments after the displayperiod; (4) An accurate record in homeworker handbooks is maintained of all hoursworked in the home-sewing activities; and (5) The employees are paid for all hours worked, both in the stores andin the home-sewing activities, in accordance with the provisions of theFLSA. Discussion of Historical Impediments to EnforcementMany commenters addressed the historical impediments to FLSA enforcementidentified by the appeals court in <T3>ILGWU</T3> v. <T3>Donovan,</T3> 722 F.2d 795 (DC Cir. 1983). The prior ban on homeworkin the restricted industries was adopted in the 1940s largely due to theseimpediments. However, as discussed above, the ban has not eliminated suchhomework. In developing the final rule, the Department carefully weighedits experience under the certification program and under the prior banto determine which of these approaches better addresses the impedimentsto FLSA enforcement among homeworkers in these industries.<ITAG tagnum="81">1. Difficulty of locating and identifying homeworkers</ITAG>The Department believes those employers who apply for certification aremotivated to comply with the Act's requirements and will maintain recordsof the names and addresses of their homeworkers. Furthermore, such employerswill be required under this rule to provide the names and addresses oftheir homeworkers to the Department at the time of the initial certificationand at each biannual certification. (Falsification of this informationis grounds for denial or revocation of a certificate.) The final rule alsoprovides an incentive for certified employers to furnish the Departmentinformation regarding uncertified competitor employers.By contrast, the ban on homework imposed under the prior rule providedlittle incentive for homework employers and employees to contact the Departmentand identify themselves or others in the restricted industries.<ITAG tagnum="81">2. Inadequate or nonexistent recordkeeping by employers and employees</ITAG>Experience in the knitted outerwear industry under the certification programhas shown that most certified employers substantially improve their recordkeepingcompliance after certification. By contrast with employers who operateillegally in the restricted industries, certified employers of homeworkerswill have strong incentives to keep proper records, namely, the desireto retain their certification and avoid civil money penalties. In addition,the revised homeworker handbook, as discussed above, will facilitate therecording of the hours of work by improving the format and instructionsfor completing the handbook. Employers will be required to provide writtenassurance that they will instruct their homeworkers to maintain accuraterecords in the handbooks and will also be required to sign a statementin each handbook indicating that to the best of their knowledge the entriesmade are accurate. Thus, the Department believes that the certificationprogram is a reasonable alternative to a total ban with respect to improvingcompliance with the FLSA recordkeeping rules.<ITAG tagnum="81">3. Strain on Departmental resources required by excessive investigativetime in homework cases</ITAG>As discussed above, the Department believes that in view of the size ofthe affected industries, and the exclusion of the employers in States wherehomework is prohibited, the scope of the final rule adopted herewith issmall.Furthermore, the phasing in of the certification program in the industriesaffected will help to spread the burden of performing prompt investigationsafter initial certificates are issued.Since 1980, despite budgetary constraints, the Department has maintainedan increased enforcement effort directed at FLSA compliance among bothlegal and illegal employers of homeworkers. This effort has resulted infar more annual investigations of such employers. With its eight-year experienceunder this special effort, the Department believes, the certification programunder the final rule with its new enforcement mechanisms will provide abetter opportunity to achieve FLSA compliance with available resourcesthan would any of the other alternatives considered. In particular, theprior ban provided no mechanisms for locating homeworker employers in theseindustries and little incentive for such employers (or their homeworkers)to cooperate in investigations. The FY 1989 Budget includes an additional20 full-time equivalent (FTE) positions for the Wage and Hour Division'scompliance activities among employers of homeworkers (certified and noncertified).At the present time, the Department believes this increase to the currentresources available should be sufficient. The Department has committeditself to maintaining a strong enforcement program for all homeworkersand will include further additional resources, as necessary, in its annualBudget requests to the Congress.<ITAG tagnum="81">4. Difficulty in recovering back wages when violations were discovered</ITAG>The Department recognizes that certified homeworker employers in the industriesaffected by this rule are mostly small entities, often with few assetsto pay the back wages found due. However, there are thousands of smallbusiness employers in many other industries who have few cash reservesto pay back wage bills, and their operations have never been banned underthe FLSA.In the Department's view, employers of homeworkers in the restricted industrieswho come forward and obtain certificates are generally more likely to complywith the FLSA's requirements, and, in the event of violations, will bemore responsive than other homeworker employers in achieving future complianceand paying any back wages due in order to retain their certificates.Moreover, the final rule specifically addresses this problem by providinga mechanism whereby the Administrator can require that employers with poorcompliance histories, as a condition for initial certification or certificaterenewal, post bonds to cover potential back wage claims. The rule furtherestablishes improved recordkeeping systems which will assist in identifyingviolations and permitting more precise back wage calculations. Finally,the rule establishes remedies (including the potential denial or revocationof certificates and civil money penalties) in addition to the basic FLSAsanctions for back wage liabilities.Based on its experience in homework investigations since 1980, the Departmentbelieves the final rule, on balance, will result in the restoration ofany back wages found due more effectively among certified employers thanwas the case under the prior rule with respect to homeworker employersin these industries.Consideration of Alternatives to CertificationPrior to the promulgation of the final rule lifting the ban on the employmentof homeworkers in the knitted outerwear industry, the Department carefullyconsidered various alternatives to a total rescission of the ban (49 FR44268). These alternatives were rejected and the certification system wasadopted. Although comments on alternatives were specifically invited, thecurrent rulemaking record provided no significant comments on these orother alternatives to the certification program. Following are the alternativeswhich were considered and rejected:A. <T3>Remove the restrictions on homework in rural areas but retain restrictionsfor urban areas. </T3>Under this alternative proposal, only persons residingin rural areas, as defined by the Secretary, would be permitted to engagein homework in the restricted industries.The Department has concluded that the alternative of removing the restrictionson homework in rural areas and retaining the restrictions in urban areasis not appropriate. Many of the comments favoring the proposals were receivedfrom individuals in rural areas, and these indicated the need to permithomework in such areas. Moreover, it would be difficult to devise a workabledefinition of the terms ``rural'' and ``urban'' that would avoid inequitabletreatment of employees. The distinctions between ``urban'' and ``rural''would be further complicated by urban employers who hired rural homeworkers,and vice versa. Finally, the Act authorizes the Department to restricthomework only to the extent necessary to safeguard the minimum wage. TheDepartment believes that under the certification system with the additionalenforcement mechanisms included in this rule, enforcement of the minimumwage provisions of the Act with respect to both urban and rural homeworkersis feasible and that compliance among certified urban and rural employersis more likely under this rule than under the prior ban.B. <T3>Expand the conditions for granting certificates permitting homeworkemployment in the restricted industries. </T3>Under this alternative proposal,the existing system for granting special individual employee certificatesauthorizing homework in the restricted industries would be expanded toinclude various additional categories of need, such as the following: Theneed to care for children or other family members; the lack of accessiblefactory employment; the lack of public transportation; and economic need.The Department has concluded that this alternative is not feasible. Itwould be difficult to define what constitutes a ``legitimate'' need foran employee to work at home and yet avoid inequities, and it could be difficultto monitor and guard against abuses (as, for example, situations in whichthe homeworker's ``legitimate'' needs changed over time or were seasonalor temporary) while providing the necessary flexibility to take into accountindividual circumstances.C. <T3>Transfer homework certification and enforcement responsibilities tothe States. </T3>The Department decided not to adopt this alternative asit is not feasible. The FLSA requires that the Secretary issue such rulesregulating or restricting homework as are needed, without regard to Stateboundaries. Because of the possibility of different certification requirementsamong States, the Department is concerned that a transfer of certificationand enforcement responsibilities to the States would be contrary to thestatutory purpose of the FLSA to establish minimum uniform labor standardsso as to prevent unfair competition. However, in keeping with the principleof federalism, and the Department's desire to avoid undermining any Statehomeworker rules, the certification program will not apply in States thatban homework in these industries. In such States, the federal ban on homeworkis retained.Scope of the Final RuleUnder these regulations, employers in the restricted industries (otherthan those in women's apparel and in certain operations in the jewelryindustry, and in States which restrict such homework) who obtain certificatesare permitted to employ homeworkers, while employers without such certificatecontinue to be subject to the prohibitions on the employment of homeworkers.Employers legally utilizing homeworkers in these industries will be knownto the Department; their homeworkers' names, addresses, and languages willbe known to the Department through the biannual certification renewal process;such employers will be required to make written assurances of FLSA compliance,conduct time studies (or other work measurements) to establish piece rates;and post bonds if requested. Their compliance with the FLSA will be determinedby investigation. Such employers will also be subject to civil money penaltiesand certificate revocation for violations. Employers who do not obtaincertificates remain subject to the ban on the use of homeworkers. The Departmentis committed to continue its efforts to locate and investigate such employers.Homeworkers of certified employers in these industries who are paid properlywill not be deprived of employment opportunities, and employers of homeworkersin these industries who fail to identify themselves and their homeworkerwill not be able to legally employ homeworkers.Executive Order 12291This rule is not classified as a ``major rule'' under Executive Order 12291on Federal Regulations, because it is not likely to result in: (1) An annualeffect on the economy of $100 million or more; (2) a major increase incosts or prices for consumers, individual industries, Federal, State orlocal government agencies, or geographic regions; or (3) significant adverseeffects on competition, employment, investment, productivity, innovation,or on the ability of United States-based enterprises to complete with foreign-basedenterprises in domestic or export markets. Therefore no regulatory impactanalysis is required.Regulatory Flexibility ActThis rule will not have a significant effect on a substantial number ofsmall entities. This conclusion is based on all information presently availableto the Department concerning the employment of homeworkers. The Secretaryhas certified to the Chief Counsel for Advocacy of the Small Business Administrationto this effect.The Chief Counsel for Advocacy filed comments in support of the proposedrule and the amended proposal and indicated the belief that the certificationprogram would provide significant benefits for small businesses by improvingtheir competitive position and increasing their ability to offer flexibilityin employment. In light of his view that the rule would likely have a substantialimpact on a significant number of small businesses seeking to employ homeworkers,he urged that a regulatory impact analysis be published with the finalrule. The Department has reviewed its preliminary conclusion that the rulewill not have a significant effect on a substantial number of small entitiesin light of the record, and finds no reason to depart from that conclusion.No persuasive data have been identified by the Department or submittedby commenters which would quantify the potential impact on small entities(including factory employers) that would or would not employ homeworkersunder this rule.This document was prepared under the direction and control of Paula V.Smith, Administrator, Wage and Hour Division, Employment Standards Administration,U.S. Department of Labor.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects </ITAG>29 CFR Part 516Minimum wage, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements.29 CFR Part 530Employment, Investigations, Labor, Law enforcement, Minimum wages, Wages,Licenses.For the reasons set forth above, 29 CFR Parts 530 and 516 are amended asset forth below.<ITAG tagnum="21">Signed at Washington, DC, on this 7th day of November 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Ann McLaughlin,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Secretary of Labor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Fred W. Alvarez, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Assistant Secretary for Employment Standards.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Paula V. Smith, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Administrator, Wage and Hour Division.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 530_EMPLOYMENT OF HOMEWORKERS IN CERTAIN INDUSTRIES</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 530 is revised to read as set forthbelow and the authority citations following all of the sections in Part530 are removed.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sec. 11, 52 Stat. 1066 (29 U.S.C. 211) as amended bySec. 9, 63 Stat. 910 (29 U.S.C. 211(d)); Secretary's Order No. 6-84, 49FR 32473, August 14, 1984; and Employment Standards Order No. 85-01, June5, 1985.</ITAG>2. The table of contents is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart A_General</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.1 Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.2 Restriction of homework.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.3 Application forms for individual homeworker certificates.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.4 Terms and conditions for the issuance of individual homeworkercertificates.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.5 Investigation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.6 Termination of individual homeworker certificates. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.7 Revocation and cancellation of individual homeworker certificates.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.8 Preservation of individual homeworker certificates.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.9 Records and reports.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.10 Delegation of authority to grant, deny, or cancel an individualhomeworker certificate.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.11 Petition for review. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.12 Special provisions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart B_Homeworker Employer Certificates</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.101 General.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.102 Requests for employer certificates.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.103 Employer assurances.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.104 Bonding or security payments.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.105 Investigations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart C_Denial/Revocation of Homeworker Employer Certificates</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.201 Conflict with State law.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.202 Piece rates_work measurement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.203 Outstanding violations and open investigations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.204 Discretionary denial or revocation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.205 Mandatory denial or revocation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.206 Special circumstances.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart D_Civil Money Penalties</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.301 General. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.302 Amounts of civil money penalties.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.303 Considerations in determining amounts.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.304 Procedures for assessment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart E_Administrative Procedures</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.401 Applicability of procedures and rules.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.402 Notice of determination.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.403 Request for hearing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.404 Referral to Administrative Law Judge.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.405 General. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.406 Decision and order of Administrative Law Judge. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.407 Procedures for initiating and undertaking review.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.408 Notice of the Secretary to review decision.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.409 Final decision of the Secretary.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.410 Special procedures.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.411 Emergency certificate revocation procedures.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.412 Alternative summary proceedings. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.413 Certification of the record.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">530.414 Equal Access to Justice Act.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A_General</ITAG>3. Sections 530.1 through 530.12 are retitled: Subpart A_General.4. In andSection; 530.1 paragraphs (b) through (j) are redesignated as (c)through (k) and a new paragraph (b) is added as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) ``Administrator'' as used in this part means the Administrator of theWage and Hour Division, Employment Standards Administration, U.S. Departmentof Labor, or an authorized representative of the Administrator.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>5. Section 530.2 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Restriction of homework.</ITAG>Except as provided in Subpart B of this part, no work in the industriesdefined in paragraphs (e) through (k) of andSection; 530.1 shall be donein or about a home, apartment, tenement, or room in a residential establishmentunless a special homework certificate issued and in effect pursuant tothis part has been obtained for each homeworker or unless the homeworkeris so engaged under the supervision of a Sheltered Workshop, as definedin andSection; 525.2 of this chapter.6. The headings to andSection; 530.3, 530.4, 530.6, 530.7, 530.8, and 530.10are revised as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Application forms for individual homeworker certificates.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.4</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Terms and conditions for the issuance of individual homeworker certificates.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.6</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Termination of individual homeworker certificates.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.7</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Revocation and cancellation of individual homeworker certificates.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.8</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Preservation of individual homeworker certificates.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Delegation of authority to grant, deny, or cancel an individual homeworkercertificate.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.4</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>7. In andSection; 530.4, paragraph (c) in its entirety is removed.8. The OMB information collection approval, which is displayed in parenthesesat the end of andSection; 530.4, is amended by removing the second sentencewhich refers to paragraph (c).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.13</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed]</ITAG>9. Section 530.13 is removed.10. New subparts B, C, D, and E are added as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52"> Subpart B_Homeworker Employer Certificates</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.101</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General.</ITAG>(a) Except as provided in subpart C, a certificate may be issued to anemployer authorizing the employment of homeworkers in(1) The knitted outerwear, gloves and mittens, and embroideries industriesas defined in paragraphs (g), (h), and (k), respectively, at andSection;530.1, effective January 9, 1989;(2) in the button and buckle and handkerchief manufacturing industriesas defined in paragraphs (i) and (j), respectively, of andSection; 530.1,effective July 9, 1989; and(3) in the jewelry industry as defined in paragraph (f) of andSection; 530.1,effective July 9, 1989, but only where the employer's homeworkers are engagedexclusively in the stringing of beads and other jewelry and the cardingand packaging of jewelry. The terms ``carding and packaging of jewelry''include the attaching of jewelry to cards, boxing and wrapping, and theuse of common household glues available to the general public, but do notinclude potentially hazardous operations such as the use of industrialglues, epoxies, soldering irons, or heating elements.(b) This certificate may be issued irrespective of whether individual homeworkersmeet the conditions set forth in paragraph (a) of andSection; 530.4 of SubpartA. Unless suspended or revoked, such certificates are valid for two-yearperiods. Applications for renewals must be submitted no later than thirty(30) days prior to the expiration date of the current certificate. Exceptas provided in subpart A, in the absence of a certificate, the employmentof homeworkers in these industries is prohibited, and an employer violatingthis prohibition is subject to all the sanctions provided in the Fair LaborStandards Act and in this part, including an injunction restraining theemployment of homeworkers.(c) Certificates authorizing such employment may be issued on the followingterms and conditions upon written application to the Administrator, Wageand Hour Division, Employment Standards Administration, U.S. Departmentof Labor, 200 Constitution Avenue, NW., Washington, DC 20210.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.102</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Requests for employer certificates.</ITAG>The initial request for certification or renewal application shall be signedby the employer and shall contain the name of the firm, its mailing address,the physical location of the firm's principal place of business and a descriptionof the business operations and items produced. In addition, the initialor renewal application shall contain the names, addresses, and languages(if other than English) spoken by the homeworkers that are currently employed(if any) or expected to be employed. The employer shall also provide theAdministrator, within thirty (30) days, a notice of each change of addressof the principal place of business. The notification shall be in writingand addressed to the Administrator, Wage and Hour Division, EmploymentStandards Administration, 200 Constitution Avenue, NW., Washington, DC20210.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.103</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Employer assurances.</ITAG>In order to be granted a certificate authorizing the employment of industrialhomeworkers, the employer must provide written assurances concerning theemployment of homeworkers subject to section 11(d) of the Fair Labor StandardsAct to the effect that:(a) All homeworkers shall be paid in accordance with the monetary provisionsof the Act.(b) All homeworkers shall be employed in compliance with the child laborprovisions contained in section 12 of the Act and regulations and ordersissued pursuant to section 12. All homeworkers will be instructed not topermit minors to work in violation of such provisions.(c) Records of hours worked and wages paid shall be maintained in accordancewith section 11 of the Act and Part 516 of this chapter.(d) All homeworkers shall complete homeworker handbooks in accordance withandSection; 516.31 of Part 516.(e) All homeworkers will be instructed to accurately record all hours worked,piece work information, and business-related expenses in the handbooks.(f) All records shall be made available for inspection and transcriptionby the Administrator or a duly authorized and designated representative,or transcription by the employer upon written request.(g) Piece rates paid to homeworkers shall be established using stop watchtime studies or other work measurement methods.(h) All homeworkers shall be encouraged to cooperate with the Departmentin any investigation that may be made.(i) With respect to jewelry manufacturing, no operations other than thestringing of beads and other jewelry and the carding and packaging of jewelrywill be performed by homeworkers.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.104 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Bonding or security payments.</ITAG>(a) Where in the Administrator's judgment there is not sufficient reasonto believe that the Act will be complied with or that money will be availableif violations of the Act occur, the Administrator may condition issuanceor renewal of a certificate to an employer upon the furnishing of a bondwith a surety or sureties satisfactory to the Administrator.(b) The Administrator shall condition issuance or reinstatement of a certificateto any employer whose application for a certificate had previously beendenied, or whose certificate had been revoked, upon the furnishing of abond.(c) Any bond required by the Administrator under paragraph (a) or (b) ofthis section shall be in an amount determined by the Administrator, upto $2500 for each homeworker to be employed by such employer under thecertificate. In lieu of a bond, the employer may furnish a cash paymentof equal amount, to be held in a special deposit account by the Administratorfor the period during which the certificate is in effect. Such bond, orcash payment, shall be subject to payment or forfeiture, in whole or inpart, upon a final determination that the employer has failed to pay minimumwages or overtime compensation to homeworkers in accordance with the Act.Any sums thus paid or forfeited to the Administrator shall be disbursedto affected homeworkers in accordance with section 16(c) of the Act.(d) At the Administrator's discretion, the obligation of a bond may berelieved, and any cash payment held as security in lieu thereof may berefunded (together with any interest accrued thereon), upon a subsequentdetermination that the employer is in compliance with the Act and thatsufficient funds will be available to meet back wage payment obligationsin the event of violations of the Act.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.105 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Investigations.</ITAG>Any employer in a restricted industry who requests certification to employhomeworkers will be investigated promptly after the issuance of the certificateby the Wage and Hour Division. Where such an employer is found to be inviolation of the FLSA, and the violations are corrected and future complianceis promised, the firm will be reinvestigated to assure that full FLSA compliancehas, in fact, been achieved.<ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart C_Denial/Revocation of Homeworker Employer Certificates</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.201</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Conflict with State law.</ITAG>No certificate will be issued pursuant to andSection; 530.101 of subpartB above authorizing the employment of homeworkers in an industry in a Statewhere the Governor (or authorized representative) has advised the Administratorof the Wage and Hour Division in writing that the employment of homeworkersin such industry, as defined in paragraphs (f) through (k) of andSection;530.1, is illegal by virtue of a State labor standards or health and safetylaw.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.202 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Piece rates_work measurement.</ITAG>(a) No certificate will be issued pursuant to andSection; 530.101 of subpartB to an employer who pays homeworkers based on piece rates unless the employerestablishes the piece rates for the different types of items produced usingstop watch time studies or other work measurement methods. Documentationof the work measurements used to establish the piece rates, and the circumstancesunder which such measurements were conducted shall be retained for threeyears and made available on request to the Wage and Hour Division.(b) The fact that an employer bases piece rates on work measurements whichindicate that the homeworkers would receive at least the minimum wage atsuch piece rate(s) does not relieve the employer from the Act's requirementthat <T3>each</T3> homeworker actually receive not less than the minimum wagefor all hours worked.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.203</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Outstanding violations and open investigations.</ITAG>A homework certificate will not be issued or renewed by the Administratorif, within the previous three years, the Administrator has found and notifiedthe applicant of a monetary violation of the Fair Labor Standards Act inan amount certain, or the Administrator has assessed a civil money penaltypursuant to subpart D of these regulations or Part 579 of this chapter(child labor), and such amounts are unpaid, or if the applicant is thesubject of a revocation proceeding at the time of the application for renewal,or the applicant is the subject of an open investigation.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.204</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Discretionary denial or revocation.</ITAG>Where the Administrator finds that the employment of homeworkers undera certificate is likely to result in violations of the Fair Labor StandardsAct, the regulations issued thereunder, or the assurances required by thispart, the Administrator may deny or revoke the certificate.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.205</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Mandatory denial or revocation.</ITAG>The Administrator shall deny or revoke a certificate in accordance withthe following standards and for the period specified in the standards:(a) <T3>Serious wage violations</T3>. Upon a finding by the Administrator ofa serious wage violation, a certificate shall be denied (including refusalto renew) or revoked for one year. A serious wage violation is definedas minimum wage or overtime pay violations of the Act totalling $10,000or more with respect to homeworkers; or minimum wage violations where 10percent or more of a certificate holder's homeworkers (but in all casesat least two homeworkers) failed to receive at least 80 percent of theminimum wage for all hours worked for 6 or more weeks in any 3 month period;or minimum wage or overtime pay violations affecting more than half ofthe homeworkers of the certificate holder for 6 or more weeks in any 3month period. All other wage violations are deemed non-serious wage violationsfor purposes of this section.(b) <T3>Repeated wage violations</T3>. For repeated wage violations found bythe Administrator, a certificate shall be denied or revoked for one tothree years, depending on the seriousness and frequency of the violations.(c) <T3>Child labor violations</T3>. Upon a finding by the Administrator ofa violation of the child labor provisions of section 12 of the Fair LaborStandards Act and the regulations at Part 570 of this title, a certificateshall be denied or revoked for one year. Upon a second finding by the Administratorof such a violation, the certificate shall be denied or revoked for threeyears.(d) <T3>Failure to pay back wages or civil money penalties judged owing. </T3>Uponthe failure of a certificate holder to pay within 60 days back wages orcivil money penalties finally judged by a court, administrative law judgeor other appropriate authority, as the case may be, to be owed by the certificateholder, or agreed to be paid by the certificate holder, or within suchlonger period as may be specified in the final order or agreement, a certificateshall be denied or revoked for up to one year or for such period as suchobligation shall remain unpaid if longer than one year.(e) <T3>Failure to cooperate in an investigation</T3>. Where the Administratorfinds obstruction of or other failure to cooperate in a Wage and Hour investigationby a certificate holder which impedes the investigation, the certificateshall be denied or revoked for a period of one to three years, dependingon the circumstances. For purposes of this regulation, cooperation includesproviding records upon request to Wage and Hour compliance officers, identifyinghomeworkers of the certificate holder, and encouraging homeworkers to makethemselves available in connection with an investigation.(f) <T3>Serious recordkeeping violations</T3>. Upon a finding by the Administratorthat a certificate holder has engaged in a serious recordkeeping violation,the certificate may be revoked for up to one year. Upon a second findingby the Administrator of a serious recordkeeping violation, a certificateshall be denied or revoked for one to three years. A serious recordkeepingviolation is defined as one where, either through errors in or omissionsof required information, the name and current address of homeworkers andthe data which is necessary for the accurate determination of hours workedby or wages paid to homeworkers or data necessary for the computation ofwages owed to homeworkers is unavailable with respect to 10 percent ormore of the homeworkers.(g) <T3>Deliberate misstatement in an application for a certificate or in otherdocuments</T3>. Upon a finding by the Administrator of a deliberate misstatementof a material fact in an application for a certificate, in payroll records,or in any other information submitted to the Wage and Hour Division ormaintained by the employer pursuant to these regulations, the certificateshall be denied or revoked for one to three years. (h) <T3>Discrimination against a homeworker</T3>. Upon a finding by the Administratorthat a certificate holder has discharged or otherwise discriminated againsta homeworker with respect to the homeworker's compensation or terms, conditions,or privileges of employment because the homeworker engaged in protectedactivity, the certificate shall be denied or revoked for three years. Protectedactivity is defined as: (1) Any complaint of a violation of the Act tothe employer, the Department or other appropriate authority, or (2) anyaction which furthers the enforcement of or compliance with the Act, suchas giving information to a Wage and Hour compliance officer.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.206</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Special circumstances.</ITAG>At the discretion of the Administrator, a certificate need not be deniedor revoked pursuant to andSection;andSection; 530.204 or 530.205 of this subpartif the Administrator finds all of the following:(a) The certificate holder, despite the exercise of due care, did not knowand did not have reason to know of the violations;(b) All back wages and civil money penalties found by the Administratorto be owing by the certificate holder have been paid; and(c) The certificate holder has taken appropriate steps to prevent recurrenceof the violations.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart D_Civil Money Penalties</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.301</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General.</ITAG>A system of civil money penalties is established to provide a remedy forany violation of the FLSA related to homework (except child labor violations,which are subject to civil money penalties pursuant to Part 579 of thischapter), or for any violation of the homeworker regulations or employers'assurances pursuant to this Part, which are not so serious as to warrantdenial or revocation of a certificate. Accordingly, no civil money penaltywill be assessed for conduct which serves as the basis of proposed denialor revocation of a certificate. (See Subpart C of this part.) Civil moneypenalties will be assessed only against employers who are operating undera certificate or who are seeking certification.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.302</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Amounts of civil money penalties.</ITAG>(a) A civil money penalty, not to exceed $500 per affected homeworker forany one violation, may be assessed for any violation of the Act or of thisPart or of the assurances given in connection with the issuance of a certificate.(b) The amount of civil money penalties shall be determined per affectedhomeworker within the limits set forth in the following schedule, exceptthat no penalty shall be assessed in the case of violations which are deemedto be <T3>de minimis </T3>in nature:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>4,L2,tp0,i1,s10,7,8,8</C> <H1>Nature of violation</H1><H1>Penalty per affected homeworker</H1><H2>Minor</H2><H2>Substantial</H2><H2>Repeated, intentional or knowing</H2><ITAG tagnum="1">Recordkeeping<D>$10-100</D><D>$100-200</D><D>$200-500</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Monetary violations<D>10-100</D><D>100-200</D><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Employment of homeworkers without a certificate<D/><D>100-200</D><D>200-500</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Other violations of statutes, regulations or employer assurances<D>10-100</D><D>100-200</D><D>200-500</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.303</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Considerations in determining amounts.</ITAG>(a) In determining the amount of a penalty within any range, the Administratorshall take into account the presence or absence of circumstances such asthe following:(1) Good faith attempts to comply with the Act or regulations;(2) Extent to which the violation is under the employer's control;(3) Non-culpable ignorance of the requirements of the Act or regulations;(4) False documents or representations; and(5) Exercise of due care.(b) An employer's financial inability to meet obligations under the Actshall not constitute a mitigating or extenuating circumstance.(c) No civil money penalty shall be assessed against an employer, who appliesfor a certificate, solely for employing homeworkers, provided the employeris not currently under investigation by the Wage and Hour Division.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.304</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Procedures for assessment.</ITAG>Assessment of penalties pursuant to this section, including administrativeproceedings, shall be in accordance with the procedures set out in SubpartE of this part.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart E_Administrative Procedures</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.401</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Applicability of procedures and rules. </ITAG>The procedures and rules contained herein prescribe the administrativeprocess which will be applied with respect to a determination to deny (includingrefusal to renew) or revoke a certificate and to a determination to assesscivil money penalties. Special rules and procedures for the emergency revocationof certificates are prescribed in andSection; 530.412 of this subpart. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.402</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notice of determination.</ITAG>Whenever the Administrator determines to deny or revoke a certificate ordetermines to assess a civil money penalty, the person affected by suchdetermination shall be notified of the determination in writing, by certifiedmail to the last known address. The notice required shall: (a) Set forth the determination of the Administrator, including the specificstatutory or regulatory provision or assurance violated, the reasons fordenying or revoking a certificate, or the amount of any civil money penaltyassessment and the reason or reasons therefor. (b) Set forth the right to request a hearing on such determination. (c) Set forth the time and method for requesting a hearing, and the proceduresrelating thereto, as set forth in andSection; 530.403 of this subpart. (d) Inform any affected person or persons that in lieu of formal proceedingsthere is available an alternative summary proceeding under andSection; 530.412of this subpart. (e) Inform any affected persons that in the absence of a timely requestfor a hearing the determination of the Administrator shall become finaland unappealable. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.403</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Request for hearing. </ITAG>(a) Except in the case of an emergency revocation under andSection; 530.411of this subpart, a request for an administrative hearing on a determinationreferred to in andSection; 530.402 of this subpart shall be made in writingto the Administrator of the Wage and Hour Division, Employment StandardsAdministration, U.S. Department of Labor, Washington DC 20210, and mustbe received no later than thirty (30) days after issuance of the noticereferred to in andSection; 530.402 of this subpart. (b) No particular form is prescribed for any request for a hearing permittedby this part. However, any such request shall be typewritten or legiblywritten; specify the issue or issues stated in the notice of determinationgiving rise to such request; state the specific reason or reasons why theperson requesting the hearing believes such determination is in error;be signed by the person making the request or by an authorized representativeof such person; and include the address at which such person or authorizedrepresentative desires to receive further communications relating thereto.(c) In the case of an emergency revocation, a request for an administrativehearing shall be made in writing to the Chief Administrative Law Judge,U.S. Department of Labor, 1111 20th Street, NW., Suite 700, Washington,DC 20036, and must be received no later than 20 days after the issuanceof the notice referred to in andSection; 530.402 of this subpart. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.404</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Referral to Administrative Law Judge. </ITAG>Upon receipt of a timely request for a hearing, the request and a copyof the notice of administrative determination complained of, shall, byOrder of Reference, be referred to the Chief Administrative Law Judge,for a determination in an administrative proceeding as provided herein.The notice of administrative determination and request for hearing shall,respectively, be given the effect of a complaint and answer thereto forpurposes of the administrative proceedings, subject to any amendment thatmay be permitted under 29 CFR Part 18. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.405</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General. </ITAG>Except as specifically provided in these regulations, the ``Rules of Practiceand Procedure for Administrative Hearings before the Office of AdministrativeLaw Judges'' established by the Secretary at 29 CFR Part 18 shall applyto administrative proceedings described in this subpart. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.406</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Decision and order of Administrative Law Judge.</ITAG>(a) The Administrative Law Judge shall prepare, after completion of thehearing and closing of the record, a decision on the issues referred bythe Administrator. (b) The decision of the Administrative Law Judge shall include a statementof findings and conclusions, with reasons and basis therefor, upon eachmaterial issue presented on the record. If the Administrative Law Judgefinds that the Administrator has established by a preponderance of theevidence the factual basis for the determination to deny or revoke a certificateor to assess a civil money penalty, that determination shall be affirmed.The decision shall also include an appropriate order which may affirm,deny, reverse, or modify, in whole or in part, the determination of theAdministrator. The reason or reasons for such order shall be stated inthe decision. (c) The decision shall be served on all parties and the Secretary in personor by certified mail. The decision when served by the Administrative LawJudge shall constitute the final order of the Department of Labor unlessthe Secretary, as provided for in andSection; 530.407 of this subpart, determinesto review the decision. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.407 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Procedures for initiating and undertaking review. </ITAG>Any party desiring review of the decision of the Administrative Law Judgemay petition the Secretary to review the decision. To be effective, suchpetition must be received by the Secretary within 30 days of the date ofthe decision of the Administrative Law Judge. Copies of the petition shallbe served on all parties and on the Chief Administrative Law Judge. Ifthe Secretary does not issue a notice accepting a petition for review within30 days after receipt of a timely filing of the petition, or within 30days of the date of the decision if no petition has been received, thedecision of the Administrative Law Judge shall be deemed the final agencyaction.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.408</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notice of the Secretary to review decision. </ITAG>Whenever the Secretary determines to review the decision and order of anAdministrative Law Judge, the Secretary shall notify each party of theissue or issues raised; the form in which submission shall be made (i.e.,briefs, oral argument, etc.); and, the time within which such presentationshall be submitted. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.409</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Final decision of the Secretary. </ITAG>The Secretary's final decision shall be served upon all parties and theAdministrative Law Judge, in person or by certified mail. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.410</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Special procedures. </ITAG>In a revocation proceeding pursuant to andSection; 530.205(d) of subpartC of this part arising as a result of a certificate holder's failure topay back wages or civil money penalties judged owing, the Administratormay file a motion for expedited decision, attaching to the notice, by affidavitor other means, evidence that a final order has been entered or agreementsigned requiring respondent to pay back wages or civil money penaltiesand that the back wages or civil money penalties have not been paid. Therespondent in the proceeding shall have 20 days in which to file a counteringaffidavit or other evidence. If no evidence countering the material assertionsof the Administrator has been submitted within 20 days, the AdministrativeLaw Judge shall, within 30 days thereafter, affirm the revocation or denialof the certificate. If the respondent does timely file such evidence, theAdministrative Law Judge shall schedule a hearing pursuant to andSection;530.411(c) of this subpart and the case shall be subject to the expeditiousprocedures following therein. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.411</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Emergency certificate revocation procedures. </ITAG>(a) When the Administrator determines that immediate revocation of a homeworkcertificate is necessary to safeguard the payment of minimum wages to homeworkers,a notice of proposed emergency revocation of a certificate shall be sentto the certificate holder pursuant to andSection; 530.402 of this subpartsetting forth reasons requiring emergency revocation of the certificate.(b) If no request for a hearing pursuant to andSection; 530.403 of this subpartis received within 20 days of the date of receipt of the notice by thecertificate holder, the proposed revocation of the certificate shall becomefinal. (c) The Office of Administrative Law Judges shall notify the parties attheir last known address, of the date, time and place for the hearing,which shall be no more than 60 days from the date of receipt of the requestfor the hearing. All parties shall be given at least 5 days notice of suchhearing. No requests for postponement shall be granted except for compellingreasons. (d) The Administrative Law Judge shall issue a decision pursuant to andSection;530.406 of this subpart within 30 days after the termination of a proceedingat which evidence was submitted. The decision shall be served on all partiesand the Secretary by certified mail and shall constitute the final orderof the Department of Labor unless the Secretary determines to review thedecision. (e) Any party desiring review of the decision of the Administrative LawJudge may petition the Secretary to review the decision of the AdministrativeLaw Judge. To be effective, such petition must be received by the Secretarywithin 30 days of the date of the decision of the Administrative Law Judge.If the Secretary does not issue a notice accepting a petition for reviewwithin 15 days after receipt of a timely filing of the petition, or within30 days of the date of the decision if no petition is filed, the decisionof the Administrative Law Judge shall be deemed the final agency action.(f) The Secretary's decision shall be issued within 60 days of the noticeby the Secretary accepting the submission, and shall be served upon allparties and the Administrative Law Judge, in person or by certified mail.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.412</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Alternative summary proceedings. </ITAG>In lieu of an administrative hearing before an Administrative Law Judgeunder the above procedures, an applicant or certificate holder who doesnot dispute the factual findings of the Administrator may, within 30 daysof the date of issuance of the notice of denial, revocation, or assessment(or within 20 days in the case of a notice of emergency revocation) petitionthe Administrator instead to reconsider the denial or revocation of thecertificate or the assessment of civil money penalties. An applicant orcertificate holder electing this informal procedure may appear before theAdministrator in person, make a written submission to the Administrator,or both. Such reconsideration by the Administrator shall be available onlyupon waiver by the applicant or certificate holder of the formal hearingprocedures provided by the above regulations. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.413</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Certification of the record. </ITAG>Upon receipt of a complaint seeking review of a final decision issued pursuantto this part filed in a United States District Court, after the administrativeremedies have been exhausted, the Chief Administrative Law Judge shallpromptly index, certify and file with the appropriate United States DistrictCourt, a full, true, and correct copy of the entire record, including thetranscript of proceedings. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 530.414</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Equal Access to Justice Act.</ITAG>Proceedings under this part are not subject to the provisions of the EqualAccess to Justice Act. In any hearing conducted pursuant to these regulations,Administrative Law Judges shall have no power or authority to award attorneyfees or other litigation expenses pursuant to the Equal Access to JusticeAct. <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 516_RECORDS TO BE KEPT BY EMPLOYERS</ITAG>11. The authority citation for Part 516 continue to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority</T4>: Sec. 11, 52 Stat. 1066, as amended, 29 U.S.C. 211 516.33also issued under 52 Stat. 1060, as amended; 29 U.S.C. 201 <T3>et seq</T3>.</ITAG>12. Paragraphs (b) and (c) of andSection; 516.31 are revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 516.31 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Industrial homeworkers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) <T3>Items required</T3>. In addition to all of the records required byandSection; 516.2, every employer of homeworkers shall maintain and preservepayroll or other records containing the following information and datawith respect to each and every industrial homeworker employed (exceptingthose homeworkers to whom section 13(d) of the Act applies and those homeworkersin Puerto Rico to whom Part 545 of this chapter applies, or in the VirginIslands to whom Part 695 of this chapter applies):(1) With respect to each lot of work:(i) Date on which work is given out to worker, or begun by worker, andamount of such work given out or begun;(ii) Date on which work is turned in by worker, and amount of such work;(iii) Kind of articles worked on and operations performed; (iv) Piece rates paid;(v) Hours worked on each lot of work turned in;(vi) Wages paid for each lot of work turned in.(2) With respect to any agent, distributor, or contractor: The name andaddress of each such agent, distributor, or contractor through whom homeworkis distributed or collected and the name and address of each homeworkerto whom homework is distributed or from whom it is collected by each suchagent, distributor, or contractor.(c) <T3>Homeworker handbook</T3>. In addition to the information and data requiredin paragraph (b) of this section, a separate handbook (to be obtained bythe employer from the Wage and Hour Division and supplied by such employerto each worker) shall be kept for each homeworker. The employer is requiredto insure that the hours worked and other information required thereinis entered by the homeworker when work is performed and/or business-relatedexpenses are incurred. This handbook must remain in the possession of thehomeworker except at the end of each pay period when it is to be submittedto the employer for transcription of the hours worked and other requiredinformation and for computation of wages to be paid. The handbooks shallinclude a provision for written verification by the employer attestingthat the homeworker was instructed to accurately record all of the requiredinformation regarding such homeworker's employment, and that, to the bestof his or her knowledge and belief, the information was recorded accurately.Once no space remains in the handbook for additional entries, or upon terminationof the homeworker's employment, the handbook shall be returned to the employer.The employer shall then preserve this handbook for at least two years andmake it available for inspection by the Wage and Hour Division on request.<ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-26041 Filed 11-9-88; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4510-27-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>